This book made available by the Internet Archive.

 

[leaf 2]

 

 

[leaf 4]

 

 

[leaf 5]

 

 PREFACE

 This is a reprint of a book which, in the former edition, also
published by us, was wrongly attributed to three authors: Karl
Liebknecht, Franz Mehring, and Rosa Luxemburg. We are now in possession
of conclusive information that Rosa Luxemburg is the sole author. Our
originally assigning it to the three names above mentioned was due to
the fact that authorship had been ascribed to the "Spartacus Group,"
and, following the general consensus of the German Socialist press, we
repeated the statement that the authorship lay with the entire group.

 Accordingly, it is Comrade Rosa Luxemburg's picture which now appears
as frontispiece, instead of Karl Lieb-knecht's. No changes have been
made in the text itself.

 The Socialist Publication Society.

 THE CRISIS IN THE GERMAN SOCIAL-DEMOCRACY

 CHAPTER I.

 The scene has thoroughly changed. The six weeks' march to Paris has
become a world drama. Mass murder has become a monotonous task, and yet
the final solution is not one step nearer. Capitalist rule is caught in
its own trap, and cannot ban the spirit that it has invoked.

 Gone is the first mad delirium. Gone are the patriotic street
demonstrations, the chase after suspicious looking automobiles, the
false telegrams, the cholera-poisoned wells. Gone, the mad stories of
Russian students who hurl bombs from every bridge of Berlin, or
Frenchmen flying over Nuremberg; gone the excesses of a spy-hunting
populace, the singing throngs, the coffee-shops with their patriotic
songs; gone the violent mobs, ready to denounce, ready to persecute
women, ready to whip themselves into a delirious frenzy over every wild
rumor; gone the atmosphere of ritual murder, the Kishineff air that left
the policeman at the corner as the only remaining representative of
himian dignity.

 The show is over. The curtain has f dlen on trains filled with
reservists, as they pull out amid the joyous cries of enthusiastic
maidens. We no longer see their laughing faces, smiling cheerily from
the train windows upon a war-mad population. Quietly they trot through
the streets, with their sacks upon their shoulders. And the public, with
a fretful face, goes about its daily task.

 Into the disillusioned atmosphere of pale daylight there rings a
different chorus; the hoarse croak of the hawks and hyenas of the
battlefield. Ten thousand tents, guaranteed according to specifications,
100,000 kilo of bacon, cocoa powder, coffee substitute, cash *on
immediate delivery. Shrapnell, drills, ammuni-

 tion bags, marriage bureaus for war widows, leather belts, war
orders—only serious propositions considered. And the cannon fodder that
was loaded upon the trains in August and September is rotting on the
battlefields of Belgium and the Vosges, while profits are springing,
like weeds, from the fields of the dead.

 Business is flourishing upon the ruins. Cities are turned into
shambles, whole countries into deserts, villages into cemeteries, whole
nations into beggars, churches into stables; popular rights, treaties,
alliances, the holiest words and the highest authorities have been torn
into scraps; every sovereign by the grace of God is called a fool, an
unfaithful wretch, by his cousin on the other side; every diplomat calls
his colleague in the enemy's country a desperate criminal; each
government looks upon the other as the evil genius of its people, worthy
only of the contempt of the world. Himger revolts in Venetia, in Lisbon,
in Moscow, in Singapore, pestilence in Russia, misery and desperation
everywhere.

 Shamed, dishonored, wading in blood and dripping with filth, thus
capitalist society stands. Not as we usually see it, playing the roles
of peace and righteousness, of order, of philosophy, of ethics—as a
roaring beast, as an orgy of anarchy, as a pestilential breath,
devastating culture and humanity—^so it appears in all its hideous
nakedness.

 And in the midst of this orgy a world tragedy has occurred; the
capitulation of the Social-Democracy. To close one's eyes to this fact,
to try to hide it, would be the most foolish, the most dangerous thing
that the international proletariat could do. "The Democrat (i. e. the
revolutionary middle-class)" says Karl Marx, "emerges from the most
shameful downfall as spotlessly as he went innocently into it. With the
strengthened confidence that he must win, he is more tiian ever certain
that he and his party need no new principles, that events and conditions
must finally come to meet them." Gigantic as his problems are his
mistakes. No

 firmly fixed plan, no orthodox ritual that holds good for all times,
shows him the path that he must travel. Historical experience is his
only teacher, his Via Dolorosa to freedom is covered not only with
unspeakable suffering, but with countless mistakes. The goal of his
journey, his final liberation, depends entirely upon the proletariat, on
whether it understands to learn from its own mistakes. Self criticism,
cruel, unsparing criticim that goes to the very root of the evil is life
and breath for the proletarian movement. The catastrophe into which the
world has thrust the socialist proletariat is an unexampled misfortune
for humanity. But Socialism is lost only if the international
proletariat is unable to measure the depths of the catastrophe and
refuses to understand the lesson that it teaches.

 The last forty-five years in the development of the labor movement are
at stake. The present situation is a closing of its accounts, a summing
up of the items of half a century of work. In the grave of the Paris
Commune lies buried the first phase of the European labor movement and
the first International. Instead of spontaneous revolution, revolts, and
barricades, after each of which the proletariat relapsed once more into
its dull passiveness, there came the systematic daily struggle, the
utilization of bourgeois parliamentarism, mass organization, the welding
of the economic with the political struggle, of socialist ideals with
the stubborn defense of most immediate interests. For the first time the
cause of the proletariat and its emancipation were led by the guiding
star of scientific knowledge. In place of sects and schools, Utopian
undertakings and experiments in every country, each altogether and
absolutely separate from each other, we found a uniform, international,
theoretical basis, that united the nations. The theoretical works of
Marx gave to the working-class of the whole world a compass by which to
fix its tactics from hour to hour, in its journey toward the one
unchanging goal.

 The bearer, the defender, the protector of this new method was

 the German Social-Democracy. The war of 1870 and the downfall of the
Paris Commune had shifted the centre of gravity of the European labor
movement to Germany. Just as France was the classic country of the first
phase of the proletarian class-struggle, as Paris was the torn and
bleeding heart of the European working-class of that time, so the German
working-class became the vanguard of the second phase. By innumerable
sacrifices in the form of agitational work it has built up the
strongest, the model organization of the proletariat, has created the
greatest press, has developed the most effective educational and
propaganda methods. It has collected under its banners the most gigantic
labor masses, and has elected the largest representative groups to its
national parliament.

 The German Social-Democracy has been generally acknowledged to be the
purest incarnation of Marxian Socialism. It has held and wielded a
peculiar prestige as teacher and leader in the second International.
Friedrich Engels wrote in his famous foreword to Marx's "Class-Struggle
in France": "Whatever may occur in other countries, the German
Social-Democracy occupies a particular place and, for the present at
least, has therefore a particular duty to perform. The two million
voters that it sends to the ballot boxes, and the young girls and women
who stand behind them as non-voters, are numerically the greatest, the
most compact mass, the most decisive force of the proletarian
international army." The German Social-Democracy was, as the "Wiener
Arbeiter-Zeitung" wrote on August 5th, 1914, the jewel of the
organization of the classconscious proletariat. In its footsteps the
French, the Italian and the Belgian Social Democracies, the labor
movements of Holland, Scandinavia, Switzerland and United States
followed more or less eagerly. The Slav nations, the Russians and the
Social-Democrats of the Balkan looked up to the German movement in
boundless, almost unquestioning admiration. In the second International
the German Social-Democracy was the determining factor. In every
congress, in the

 meetings of the International Socialist Bureau, everything waited upon
the opinion of the German group.

 Particularly in the fight against militarism and war the position taken
by the German Social-Democracy has always been decisive. "We Germans
cannot accept that," was usually sufficient to determine the orientation
of the International. Blindly confident, it submitted to the leadership
of the much admired, mighty German Social-Democracy. It was the pride of
every Socialist, the horror of the ruling classes of all countires.

 And what happened in Germany when the great historical crisis came? The
deepest fall, the mightiest cataclysm. Nowhere was the organization of
the proletariat made so completely subservient to imperialism. Nowhere
was the state of siege so uncomplainingly borne. Nowhere was the press
so thoroughly gagged, public opinion so completely choked off; nowhere
was the political and industrial class-struggle of the working-class so
entirely abandoned as in Germany.

 But the German Social-Democracy was not only the strongest body, it was
the thinking brain of the International as well. Therefore the process
of self-analysis and appraisement must begin in its own movement, with
its own case. It is in honor bound to lead the way to the rescue of
international Socialism, to proceed with the unsparing criticism of its
own shortcomings.

 No other party, no other class in capitalist society can dare to expose
its own errors, its own weaknesses, before the whole world in the clear
mirror of reason, for the mirror would reflect the historical fate that
is hidden behind it. The working-class can always look truth in the face
even when this means bitterest self-accusation; for its weakness was but
an error and the inexorable laws of history give it strength and assure
its final victory.

 This unsparing self-criticism is not only a fundamental necessity, but
the highest duty of the working-class as well. We have on board the
highest treasure of humarity, and the proletariat

 is their ordained protector. While capitalist society, shamed and
dishonored, rushes through the bloody orgy to its doom, the
international proletariat will gather the golden treasures that were
allowed to sink to the bottom in the wild whirlpool of the world-war in
the moment of confusion and weakness.

 One thing is certain. It is a foolish delusion to believe that we need
only live through the war, as a rabbit hides under the bush to await the
end of a thunderstorm, to trot merrily off in his old accustomed gait
when all is over. The world-war has changed the condition of our
struggle, and has changed us most of all. Not that the laws of
capitalist development or the life and death conflict between capital
and labor have been changed or minimized. Even now, in the midst of the
war, the masks are falling, and the old well-known faces grinning at us.
But evolution has received a mighty forward impetus through the outbreak
of the imperialist volcano. The enormity of the tasks that tower before
the socialist proletariat in the immediate future make the past
struggles of the labor movement seem but a delightful idyll in
comparison.

 Historically the war is ordained to give to the cause of labor a mighty
impetus. Marx, whose prophetic eyes foresaw so many historic events as
they lay in the womb of the future, writes, in "The Class-Struggle in
France," the following significant passage: "In France the middle class
does what should normally be done by the industrial bourgeoisie (i. e.
to fight for the democratic republic); but who shall solve the problems
of labor? They will not be solved in France. They will be proclaimed in
France. They will nowhere be solved within national boundaries. Qass war
in France will revert into a world war. The solution will begin only
when the world war has driven the proletariat into the leadership of
that nation which controls the world market, to the leadership of
England. The revolution that will here find, not its end, but its
organizatory beginning, is no short-lived one. The present generation is
like the Jews who were led by

 Moses through the wilderness. Not only must it conquer a new world, it
must go down to make way for those who will be better able to cope with
its problems."

 This was written in 1850, at a time when England was the only
capitalistically developed nation, when the English proletariat was the
best organized and seemed destined through the industrial growth of its
nation to take the leadership in the international labor movement. Read
Germany instead of England, and the words of Karl Marx become an
inspired prohpecy of the present world war. It is ordained to drive the
Grerman proletariat "to the leadership of the people, and thus to create
the or-ganizatory beginning of the great international conflict between
labor and capital for the political supremacy of the world."

 Have we ever had a different conception of the role to be played by the
working-class in the great world-war? Have we forgotten how we were wont
to describe the coming event, only a few short years ago? "Then will
come the catastrophe. All Europe will be called to arms, and sixteen to
eighteen million men, the flower of the nations, armed with the best
instruments of murder will make war upon each other. But I believe that
behind this march there looms the final crash. Not we, but they
themselves will bring it. They are driving things to the extreme, they
are leading us straight into a catastrophe. They will harvest what they
have sown. The Goetterdaemmerung of the bourgeois world is at hand. Be
sure of that. It is coming." Thus spoke Bebel, the speaker of our group
in the Reichstag in the Morocco debate.

 An official leaflet published by the Party, "Imperialism and
Socialism," that was distributed in hundreds of thousands of copies only
a few years ago, closes with the words: "Thus the struggle against
militarism daily becomes more and more clearly a decisive struggle
between capital and labor. War, high prices and capitalism—peace,
happiness for all. Socialism! Yours is the

 choice. History is hastening onward toward a decision. The proletariat
must work unceasingly at its world mission, must strengthen the power of
its organization and the clearness of its understanding. Then, come what
will, whether it will succeed, by its power, in saving humanity from the
horrible cruelties of the world-war, or whether capitalism shall sink
back into history, as it was bom, in blood and violence, the historic
moment will find the working-class prepared, and preparedness is
everything."

 The official handbook for socialist voters, in 1911, the date of the
last Reichstag elections, contains, on page 42, the following comments
on the expected world-war: "Do our rulers and our ruling classes dare to
demand this awful thing of the people? Will not a cry of horror, of fury
and of indignation fill the country and lead the people to put an end to
this murder? Will they not ask: 'For whom and for what? Are we insane
that we should be treated thus or should tolerate such treatment?' He
who dispassionately considers the possibility of a great European
world-war can come to no other conclusion."

 "The next European war will be a game of va-banque, whose equal the
world has never seen before. It will be, in all probability, the last
war."

 With such words the Reichstag representatives won their 110 seats in
the Reichstag.

 When in the summer of 1911 the "Panther" made its spring to Agadir, and
the noisy clamor of German imperialists brought Europe to the precipice
of war, an international meeting in London, on the 4th of August,
adopted the following resolution:

 "The German, Spanish, English, Dutch and French delegates of labor
organizations hereby declare their readiness to oppose ■every
declaration of war with every means in their power. Every nationality
here represented pledges itself, in accordance with the decisions of its
national and international congresses to oppose all criminal
machinations on the part of the ruling classes."

 But when in November, 1910, the International Peace Congress met at
Basel, when the long train of labor representatives entered the Minster,
a presentiment of the coming hour of fate made them shudder and the
heroic resolve took shape in every breast.

 The cool, sceptical Victor Adler cried out: "Comrades, it is most
important that we here, at the common source of our strength, that we,
each and every one of us take from hence the strength to do in his
country what he can, through the forms and means that are at his
disposal, to oppose this crime of war. And if it should be accomplished,
if we should really be able to prevent war, let this be the cornerstone
of our coming victory. That :s the spirit that animates the whole
International.

 "And when murder and arson and pestilence sweep over civilized
Europe—we can think of it only with horror and indignation, and protests
ring from our hearts. And we ask, are the proletarians of today really
nothing but sheep to be led mutely to the slaughter?"

 Troelstra spoke in the name of the small nations, in the name of the
Belgians as well:

 "With their blood and with all that they possess the proletariat of the
small nations swear their allegiance to the International in everything
that it may decide to prevent war. Again we repeat that we expect, when
the ruling classes of the large nations call the sons of the proletariat
to arms to satiate the lust for power and the greed of their rulers, in
the blood and on th,e lands of the small peoples, we expect that then
the sons of the proletariat, under the powerful influence of their
proletarian parents and of the proletarian press, will think thrice
before they harm us, their friends, in the service of the enemies of
culture."

 And Jaures closed his speech, after the anti-war manifesto of the
International Bureau had been read:

 "The International represents the moral forces of the world! And when
the tragic hour strikes, when we must sacrifice our-

 selves, this knowledge will support and strengthen us. Not lightly, but
from the bottom of our hearts we declare that we are ready for all
sacrifices 1"

 It was like a Ruetli pledge. The whole world looked toward the Minster
of Basel, where the bells, slowly and solemnly, rang to the approaching
great fight between the armies of labor and capital.

 On the third of September, 1913, the social-democratic deputy, David,
spoke in the German Reichstag:

 "That was the most beautiful hour of my life. That I here avow. When
the chimes of the Minster rang in the long train of international
Social-Democrats, when the red flags were planted in the nave of the
church about the altar, when the emissaries of the people were greeted
by the peels of the organ that resounded the message of peace, that was
an impression that I can never forget ....

 "You must realize what it was that happened here. The masses have
ceased to be willess, thoughtless herds. That is new in the history of
the world. Hitherto the masses have always blindly followed the lead of
those who were interested in war, who drove the peoples at each others'
throats to mass murder. That will stop. The masses have ceased to be the
instruments, the yeomen of war profiteers."

 A week before the war broke out, on the 26th of July, 1914, the German
party papers wrote:

 "We are no marionettes; we are fighting with all our might, against a
system that makes men the powerless tools of blind circumstances,
against this capitalism that is preparing to change Europe, thirsty for
peace, into a smoking battlefield. If destruction takes its course, if
the determined will for peace of the German, of the international
proletariat, that will find expression in the next few days in mighty
demonstrations^ should not be

 able to prevent the world-war, then it must be at least, the last war,
it must be the Goetterdaemmerung of capitalism."

 On the 30th of July, 1914, the central organ of the German
Social-Democracy cried out:

 "The socialist proletariat rejects all responsibility for the events
that are being precipitated by a ruling class that is blinded, and on
the verge of madness. We know that for us new life will spring from the
ruins. But the responsibility falls upon the rulers of today.

 "For them it is a question of existence!

 "Die Weltgeschichte ist das Weltgericht!"

 And then came the awful, the incredible 4th of August, 1914.

 Did it have to come ? An event of such importance cannot be a mere
accident. It must have its deep, significant, objective causes. But
perhaps these causes may be found in the errors of the leader of the
proletariat, the Social-Democracy itself, in the fact that our readiness
to fight has flagged, that our courage and our convictions have forsaken
us. Scientific Socialism has taught us to recognize the objective laws
of historical development. Man does not make history of his own
volition, but he makes history nevertheless. The proletariat is
dependent in its actions upon the degree of righteousness to which
social evolution has advanced. But again, social evolution is not a
thing apart from the proletariat; it is in the same measure its driving
force and its cause as well as its product and its effect. And though we
can no more skip a period in our historical development than a man can
jump over his shadow, it lies within our power to accelerate or to
retard it.

 Socialism is the first popular movement in the world that has set.
itself a goal and has established in the social life of man a conscious
thought, a definite plan, the free will of mankind. For this reason
Friedrich Engels calls the final victory of the socialist proletariat a
stride by human kind from the animal kingdom into

 the kingdom of liberty. This step, too, is bound by unalterable
historical laws to the thousands of rungs of the ladder of the past with
its tortuous, sluggish growth. But it will never be accomplished, if the
burning spark of the conscious will of the masses does not spring from
the material conditions that have been built up by past development.
Socialism will not fall as manna from heaven. It can only be won by a
long chain of powerful struggles, in which the proletariat, under the
leadership of the Social-Democracy, will learn to take hold of the
rudder of society to become, instead of the powerless victim of history,
its conscious guide.

 Friedrich Engels once said:

 "Capitalist society faces a dilemma, either an advance to Socialism or
a reversion to barbarism." What does a "reversion to barbarism" mean at
the present stage of European civilization? We have read and repeated
these words thoughtlessly, without a conception of their terrible
import. At this moment one glance about us will show us what a reversion
to barbarism in capitalist society means. This world-war means a
reversion to barbarism. The triumph of imperialism leads to the
destruction of culture, sporadically during a modern war, and forever,
if the period of world-wars that has just begun is allowed to take its
damnable course to the last ultimate consequence. Thus we stand today,
as Friedrich Engels prophesied more than a generation ago, before the
awful proposition: Either the triumph of imperialism and the destruction
of all culture, and, as in ancient Rome, depopulation, desolation,
degeneration, a vast cemetery; or, the victory of Socialism, that is,
the conscious struggle of the international proletariat against
imperialism, against its methods, against war. This is the dilemma of
world history, its inevitable choice, whose scales are trembling in the
balance, awaiting the decision of the proletariat. Upon it depends the
future of culture and humanity. In this war imperialism has been
victorious. Its brutal sword of murder has dashed the scales, with
overbear-

 ing brutality, down into the abyss of shame and misery. If the
proletariat learns from this war and in this war to exert itself, to
cast oif its serfdom to the ruling classes, to become the lord of its
own destiny, the shame and misery will not have been in vain. The modern
working-class must pay dearly for each realization of its historic
mission. The road to the Golgotha of its class liberation is strewn with
awful sacrifices. The Jime-combatants, the victims of the Commune, the
martyrs of the Russian Revolution—an endless line of bloody shadows.
They have fallen on the field of honor, as Marx wrote of the heroes of
the Commune, to be enshrined forever in the great heart of the
working-class. Now millions of proletarians are falling on the field of
dishonor, of fratricide, of self-destruction, the slave-song on their
lips. And that, too, has not been spared us. We are like the Jews whom
Moses led through the desert. But we are not lost, and we will be
victorious if we have not forgotten how to learn. And if the modern
leaders of the proletariat do not know how to learn, they will go down
"to make room for those who will be more able to cope with the problems
of a new world."

 CHAPTER II.

 "We are now facing the irrevocable fact of war. We are threatened by
the horrors of invasion. The decision, today, is not for or against war;
for us there can be but one question: By what means is this war to be
conducted? Much, aye every-thing, is at stake for our people and its
future, if Russian despotism, stained with the blood of its own people,
should be the victor. This danger must be averted, the civilization and
the independence of our people must be safeguarded. Therefore we will
carry out what we have always promised: In the hour of danger we will
not desert our fatherland. In this we feel that we stand in harmony with
the International, which has always recognized the right of every people
to its national independence, as we stand in agreement with the
International in emphatically denouncing every war of conquest. Actuated
by these motives^ we vote in favor of the war credits demanded by the
Government."

 With these words the Reichstag group issued the countersign that
determined and controlled the position of the German working-class
during the war. Fatherland in danger, national defense, people's war for
existence, Kultur, liberty—^these were the slogans proclaimed by the
parliamentary representatives of the Social-Democracy. What followed was
but the logical sequence. The position of the Party and the labor union
press, the patriotic frenzy of the masses, the civil peace, the
disintegration of the International, all these things were the
inevitable consequence of that momentous orientation in the Reichstag.

 If it is true that this war is really a fight for national existence,
for freedom, if it is true that these priceless possessions can be
defended only by the iron tools of murder, if this war is the holy cause
of the people, then everything else follows as a matter of course, we
must take everything that the war may bring as a

 part of the bargain. He who desires the purpose must be satisfied with
the means. War is methodical, organized, gigantic murder. But in normal
human beings this systematic murder is possible only when a state of
intoxication has been previously created. This has always been the tried
and proven method of those who make war. Bestiality of action must find
a commensurate bestiality of thought and senses; the latter must prepare
and accompany the former. Thus the "Wahre Jacob" of August 28th, 1914,
with its brutal picture of the German thresher, the Party papers of
Chemnitz, Hamburg, Kiel, Frankfurt a. M., Koburg and others, with their
patriotic drive in poetry and prose, were the necessary narcotic for a
proletariat that could rescue its existence and its liberty only by
plimging the deadly steel into its French and English brothers. These
chauvinistic papers are after all a great deal more logical and
consistent than those others who attempted to imite hill and valley, war
with humanity, murder with brotherly love, the voting for war credits
with socialist internationalism.

 If the stand taken by the German Reichstag group on the fourth of
August was correct, then the death sentence of the proletarian
International has been spoken, not only for this war, but for ever. For
the first time since the modern labor movement exists there yawns an
abyss between the commandments of international solidarity of the
proletariat of the world and the interests of freedom and nationalist
existence of the people; for the first tirne we discover that the
independence and liberty of the nations command that workingmen kill and
destroy each other. Up to this time we have cherished the belief that
the interests of the peoples of all nations, that the class interests of
the proletariat are a harmonious unit, that they are identical, that
they cannot possibly come into conflict with one another. That was the
basis of our theory and practice, the soul of our agitation. Were we
mistaken in the cardinal point of our whole world philosophy? We are
holding an inquest over international Socialism.

 This world war is not the first crisis through which our international
principles have passed. Our Party was first tried forty-five years ago.
At that time, on the 21st of July, 1870, Wilhelm Liebknecht and August
Bebel made the following historical declaration before the Reichstag:

 "The present war is a dynastic war in the interest of the Bonaparte
dynasty, as the war of 1866 was conducted in the interest of the
Hohenzollern dynasty.

 "We cannot vote for the funds which are demanded from the Reichstag to
conduct this war because this would be, in effect, a vote of confidence
in the Prussian government. And we know that the Prussian government, by
its action in 1866, prepared this war. At the same time we cannot vote
against the budget, lest this be construed to mean that we support the
conscienceless and criminal policies of Bonaparte.

 "As opponents, on principle, of every dynastic war, as
Socialist-Republicans and members of the 'International Working-men's
Association' which, without regard to nationality, has fought all
oppressors, has tried to unite all the oppressed into a great band of
brothers, we cannot directly or indirectly lend support to the present
war. We therefore refuse to vote, while expressing the earnest hope that
the peoples of Europe, taught by the present unholy events, will strive
to win the right to control their own destinies, to do away with the
present rule of might and class as the cause of all social and national
evil."

 With this declaration the representatives of the German proletariat put
their cause clearly and unreservedly under the banner of the
International and definitely repudiated the war against France as a
national war of independence. It is well known that Bebel many years
later, in his memoirs, stated that he would have voted against the war
loan had he known, when the vote was taken, the things that were
revealed in the years that followed.

 Thus, in a war that was considered by the whole bourgeois

 public, and by a powerful majority of the people under the influence of
Bismarckian strategy, as a war in the national life interest of Germany,
the leaders of the German Social-Democracy held firmly to the conviction
that the life interest of a nation and the class interest of the
proletariat are one, that both are opposed to war. It was left to the
present world war and to the Social-Democratic Reichstag group to
uncover, for the first time, the terrible dilemma—either you are for
national liberty—or for international Socialism.

 Now the fundamental fact in the declaration of our Reichstag group was,
in all probability, a sudden inspiration. It was simply an echo of the
crown speech and of the Chancellor's speech of August fourth. "We are
not driven by the desire for conquest," we hear in the crown speech, "we
are inspired by the unalterable determination to preserve the land upon
which God has placed us for ourselves, and for all coming generations.
From the documents that have been presented to you, you will have seen
how My Government, and above all My Chancellor strove, to the last, to
avert the utmost. We grasp the sword in self-defense, with a clear
conscience and a clean hand." And Bethmann-Hollweg declared: "Gentlemen,
we are acting in self-defense, and necessity knows no law. He who is
threatened as we are threatened, he who is fighting for the highest aims
can be guided by but one consideration, how best to beat his way out of
the struggle. We are fighting for the fruits of our peaceful labor, for
the heritage of our great past, for the future of our nation." Wherein
does this differ from the social-democratic declaration? 1. We have done
everything to preserve peace, the war was forced upon us by others. 2.
Now that the war is here we must act in self-defense. 3. In this war the
German people is in danger of losing everything. This declaration of our
Reichstag group is an obvious rehashing of the government declaration.
As the latter based their claims upon diplomatic negotiations and
imperial telegrams, so the socialist group points to peace
demonstrations of

 the Social-Democracy before the war. Where the crown speech denies all
aims of conquest, the Reichstag group repudiates a war of conquest by
standing upon its Socialism. And when the Emperor and the Chancellor cry
out, "We are fighting for the highest principles. We know no parties, we
know only Germans," the social-democratic declaration echoes: "Our
people risks everything. In this hour of danger we will not desert our
Fatherland." Only in one point does the social-democratic declaration
differ from its government model, it placed the danger of Russian
despotism in the foreground of its orientation, as a danger to German
freedom. The crown speech says, regarding Russia: "With a heavy heart I
have been forced to mobilize against a neighbor with whom I have fought
upon so many battle fields. With honest sorrow I have seen a friendship
faithfully kept by Germany, fall to pieces." The social-democratic group
changed this sorrowful rupture of a true friendship with the Russian
Tsar into a fanfare for liberty against despotism, used the
revolutionary heritage of Socialism to give to the war a democratic
mantle, a popular halo. Here alone the social-democratic declaration
gives evidence of independent thought on the part of our
Social-Democrats.

 As we have said, all these things came to the Social Democracy as a
sudden inspiration on the fourth of August. All that they 'had said up
to this day, every declaration that they had made, down to the very eve
of the war, was in diametrical opposition to the declaration df the
Reichstag group. The "Vorwaerts" wrote on July 25th, when the Austrian
ultimatum to Servia was published:

 "They want the war, the unscrupulous elements that influence and
determine the Wiener Hofburg. They want the war—it has been ringing out
of the wild cries of the black-yellow press for weeks. They want the
war—the Austrian ultimatum to Servia makes it plain and clear to the
world.

 "Because the blood of Franz Ferdinand and his wife flowed under the
shots of an insane fanatic, shall the blood of thousands of workers

 and fanners be shed? Shall one insane crime be purged by another even
more insane? . , . The Austrian ultimatum may be the torch that will set
Europe in flames at all four corners.

 "For this ultimatum, in its form and in its demands, is so shameless,
that a Servian Government that should humbly retreat before this note,
would have to reckon with the possibility of being driven out by the
masses of the people between dinner and dessert. . . .

 "It was a crime of the chauvinistic press of Germany to egg on our dear
Ally to the utmost in its desire for war. And beyond a doubt, Herr von
Bethmann-Hollweg promised Herr Berchtold our support. But Berlin is
playing a game as dangerous as that being played by Vienna."

 The "Leipziger Volkszeitung" wrote on July 24th:

 "The Austrian military party has staked everything on one card, for in
no country in the world has national and military chauvinism anything to
lose. In Austria chauvinistic circles are particularly bankrupt; their
nationalistic howls are a frantic attempt to cover up Austria's economic
ruin, the robbery and murder of war to fill its coffers ..."

 The "Dresden Volkszeitung" said, on the same day:

 "Thus far the war maniacs of the Wiener Ballplatz have failed to
furnish proof that would justify Austria in the demands it has made upon
Servia. So long as the Austrian Government is not in a position to do
this, it places itself, by its provocative and insulting attacks upon
Servia, in a false position before all Europe. And even if Servia's
guilt was proven, even if the assassination in Serajewo had actually
been prepared under the eyes of the Servian Government, the demands made
in the note are far in excess of normal bounds. Only the most
unscrupulous war lust can explain such demands upon another state. . ."

 The "Muenchener Post," on July 25th, wrote:

 "This Austrian note is a document unequalled in the history of the last
two centuries. Upon the findings of an investigation whose contents
have, till now, been kept from the European public, without court
proceedings against the murderer of the heir-presumptive and his spouse,
it makes demands on Servia, the acceptance of which would mean national
suicide to Servia. . ."

 %6 THE CRISIS

 The "Schleswig-Holstein Volkszeitung" declared, on the 24th of Juiy:

 "Austria is provoking Servia. Austria-Hungary wants war, and is
committing a crime that may drown all Europe in blood. . . Austria is
playing va banque. It dares a provocation of the Servian state that the
latter, if it is not entirely defenseless, will certainly refuse to
tolerate. . .

 "Every civilized person must protest emphatically against the criminal
behavior of the Austrian rulers. It is the duty of the workers above
all, and of all other human beings who honor peace and civilization, to
try their utmost to prevent the consequences of the bloody insanity that
has broken out in Vienna."

 The "Magdeburger Volksstimme" of July 25th said:

 "Any Servian Government that even pretended to consider these demands
seriously would be swept out in the same hour by the Parliament and by
the people.

 "The action of Austria is the more despicable because Berchtold is
standing before the Servian Government and before Europe with empty
hands.

 "To precipitate a war such as this at the present time, means to invite
a world war. To act thus shows a desire to disturb the peace of an
entire hemisphere. One cannot thus make moral conquests, or convince
non-participants of one's own righteousness. It can be safely assumed
that the press of Europe, and with it the European governments, will
call the vainglorious and senseless Viennese statesmen energetically and
unmistakably to order."

 On July 24th the "Frankfurter Volksstimme" wrote:

 "Upheld by the agitation of the clerical press, which mourns in Franz
Ferdinand its best friend and demands that his death be avenged upon the
Servian people, upheld by German war patriots whose language becomes
daily more contemptible and more threatening, the Austrian Government
has allowed itself to be driven to send an ultimatum to Servia couched
in language that, for presumptuousness, leaves little to be desired;
containing demands whose fulfillment by the Servian Government is
manifestly impossible."

 On the same day the "Elberfelder Freie Presse" wrote: "A telegram of
the semi-official Wolf Bureau reports the terms of the demands made on
Servia by Austria. From these it may be

 gathered that the rulers in Vienna are pushing toward war with all
their might. For the conditions imposed by the note that was presented
in Belgrade last night are nothing short of a protectorate of Austria
over Servia. It is eminently necessary that the diplomats of Berlin make
the war agitators of Vienna und€rstand that Germany will not move a
finger to support such outrageous demands, that a withdrawal of the
threats would be advisable."

 The "Bergische Arlbeiterstimme" of Solingen writes:

 "Austria demands a conflict with Servia, and uses the assassination at
Serajewo as a pretext for putting Servia morally in the wrong. But the
whole matter has b^en approached too clumsily to influence European
public opinion.

 "But if the war agitators of the Wiener Ballplatz believe that their
allies of the Triple Alliance, Germany and Italy, will come to their
assistance in a conflict in which Russia, too, will be involved, they
are suffering from a dangerous illusion. Italy would welcome the
weakening of Austria-Hungary, its rival on the Adriatic and in the
Balkans, and would certainly decline to burn its fingers to help
Austria. In Germany, on the other hand, the powers that be—even should
they be so foolish as to wish it—would not dare to risk the life of a
single soldier to satisfy the criminal lust for power of the Hapsburgers
without arousing the fury of the entire people."

 Thus the entire working-class press, without exception, judged the
war's causes a week before its outbreak. Obviously the question was one
of neither the existence nor the freedom of Germany, but a shamefid
adventure of the Austrian war party; not a question of self-defense,
national protection and a holy war forced upon us in the name of
freedom, but a bold provocation, an abominable threat against foreign,
Servian, independence and liberty.

 What was it that happened on August fourth to turn this clearly defined
and so unanimously accepted attitude of the Social-Democracy upside
down? Only one new factor had appeared—the White Book that was presented
to the Reichstag by the German Government on that day. And this
contained, on page 4, the following:

 "Under these circumstances Austria must say to itself that it is
incompatible with the dignity and the safety of the monarchy to remain
inactive any longer in face of the occurrences across the border. The
Austrian Imperial Government has notified us of this, their attitude,
and has begged us to state our views. Out of a full heart we could but
assure our Ally of our agreement with this interpretation of conditions
and assure him that any action that would seem necessary to put an end
to Servian attempts against the existence of the Austrian monarchy would
meet with our approval. We fully realized that eventual war measures
undertaken by Austria must bring Russia ioto the situation and that we,
in order to carry out our duty as ally, might be driven into war. But we
could not, realizing as we did that the most vital interests of
Austria-Hungary were threatened, advise our ally to adopt a policy of
acquiescence, that could not possibly be brought into accord with its
dignity, nor could we refuse to lend our aid in this attitude.

 "And we were particularly prevented from taking this stand by the fact
that the persistent subversive Serbian agitation seriously jeopardized
us. If the Serbians had been permitted, with the aid of Russia and
France, to continue to threaten the existence of the neighboring
monarchy, there would have ensued a gradual collapse of Austria and a
subjection of all the Slavic races under the Russian sceptre, which
would have rendered untenable the situation of the Germanic race in
Central Europe. A morally weakened Austria, succumbing before the
advance of Russian Panslavism, would no longer be an ally on which we
could count and depend, as we are obliged to do in view of the
increasingly menacing attitude of our neighbors to the East and to the
West We therefore gave Austria a free hand in her proceedings against
Serbia. We have had no share in the preparations."

 These were the words that lay before the social-democratic Reichstag
group on August 4th, the only important and deter-

 mining phrases in the entire White Book, a concise declaration of the
German Government beside which all other yellow, grey, blue, orange
books on the diplomatic passages that preceded the war and its most
immediate causes become absolutely irrevelant and insignificant. Here
the Reichstag group had the key to a correct judgment of the situation
in hand. The entire social-democratic press, a week before, had cried
out that the Austrian ultimatum was a criminal provocation of the world
war and demanded preventative and pacific action on the part of the
German Government. The entire socialist press assiuned that the Austrian
ultimatum had descended upon the German Government like a bolt from the
blue as it had upon the German public. But now the White Book declared,
briefly and clearly: 1. That the Austrian Government had requested
German sanction before taking a final step against Servia. 2. That the
German Government clearly understood that the action tmdertaken by
Austria would lead to war with Servia, and ultimately, to European war.
3. That the German Government did not advise Austria to give in, but on
the contrary declared that an acquiescent, weakened Austria could not be
regarded as a worthy ally of Germany. 4. That the German Government
assured Austria, before it advanced against Servia, of its assistance
under all circumstances, in case of war, and finally, 5. That the German
Government, withal, had not reserved for itself control over the
decisive ultimatum from Austria to Servia, upon which the whole world
war depended, but had left to Austria "an absolutely free hand."

 All of this our Reichstag group learned on August 4th. And still
another fact it learned from the Government—^that German forces already
had invaded Belgium. And from all this the Social-Democratic group
concluded that this is a war of defense against foreign invasion, for
the existence of the fatherland, for "Kultur," a war for liberty against
Russian despotism.

 Was the obvious background of the war, and the scenery that so scantily
concealed it, was the whole diplomatic performance

 that was acted out at the outbreak of the war, with its clamor about a
world of enemies, all threatening the life of Germany, all moved by the
one desire to weaken, to humiliate, to subjugate the German people and
nation—were all these things such a complete surprise? Did these factors
actually call for more judgment, more critical sagacity than they
possessed? Nowhere was this less true than of our Party. It had already
gone through two great German wars, and in both of them had received
memorable lessons.

 Even a poorly-informed student of history knows that the war of 1866
against Austria was systematically prepared by Bismarck long before it
broke out, and that his policies, from the very beginning, led
inevitably to a rupture and to war with Austria. The Crown Prince
himself, the later Emperor Frederick, in his memoirs under the date of
November 14th of that year, speaks of this purpose of the Chancellor:

 "He (Bismarck), when he went into office, was firmly resolved to bring
Prussia to a war with Austria, but was very careful not to betray this
purpose, either at that time or on any other premature occasion to his
Majesty, until the time seemed favorable."

 "Compare with this confession," says Auer in his brochure 'Die
Sedanfeier und die Sozialdemokratie,' "the proclamation that King
William sent out 'to my people.'"

 "The Fatherland is in danger! Austria and a large part of Germany have
risen in arms against us.

 "It is only a few years ago since I, of my own free will, without
thinking of former misunderstandings, held out a fraternal hand to
Austria in order to save a German nation from foreign domination. But my
hopes have been blasted. Austria cannot forget that its lords once ruled
Germany; it refuses to see in the younger, more virile Prussia an ally,
but persists in regarding it as a dangerous rival. Prussia—so it
believes—^must be opposed in all its

 aims, because whatever favors Prussia harms Austria. The old unholy
jealousy has again broken out; Prussia is to be weakened, destroyed,
dishonored. All treaties with Prussia are void, German lords are not
only called upon, but persuaded, to sever their alliance with Prussia.
Wherever we look, in Germany, we are surrounded by enemies whose war cry
is—Down with Prussia!"

 Praying for the blessings of heaven, King William ordered a general day
of prayer and penance for the 18th of July, saying:

 "It has not pleased God to crown with success my attempts to preserve
the blessings of peace for my people."

 Should not the official accompaniment to the outbreak of the war on
August 4th have awakened in the minds of our group vivid memories of
long remembered words and melodies? Had they completely forgotten their
party history?

 But not'enough! In the year 1870 there came the war with France, and
history has united its outbreak with an unforgettable occurrence; the
Ems dispatch, a document that has become a classic byword for
capitalist-government art in war making, and which marks a memorable
episode in our party history. Was it not old Liebknecht, was it not the
German Social-Democracy who felt in duty bound, at that time, to
disclose these facts and to show to the masses "how wars are made ?"

 Making war simply and solely for the protection of the Fatherland was,
by the way, not Bismarck's invention. He only carried out, with
characteristic unscrupulousness, an old, well known and truly
international recipe of capitalist statesmanship. When and where has
there been a war since so-called public opinion has played a role in
governmental calculations, in which each and every belligerent party did
not, with a heavy heart, draw the sword from its sheath for the single
and sole purpose of defending its Fatherland and its own righteous
course from the shameful attacks of the enemy? This legend is as
inextricably a part of the game of war as powder and lead. The game is
old. Only, that the Social-Deraocra:tic Party should play it is new.

 THE CRISIS

 CHAPTER III.

 Our Party should have been prepared to recognize the real aims of this
war, to meet it without surprise, to judge it by its deeper relationship
according to their wide political experience. The events and forces that
led to August 4th, 1914, were no secrets. The world had been preparing
for decades, in broad daylight, in the widest publicity, step by step
and hour by hour, for the world war. And if today a number of Socialists
threaten with horrible destruction the "secret diplomacy" that has
brewed this deviltry behind the scenes, they are ascribing to these poor
wretdies a magic power that they little deserve, just as the Boto-kude
whips his fetish for the outbreak of a storm. The so-called captains of
nations are, in this war, as at all times, merely chessmen, moved by
all-powerful historic events and forces, on the surface of capitalist
society. If ever there were persons capable of understanding these
events and occurrences, it was the members of the German
Social-Democracy.

 Two lines of development in recent history lead straight to the present
war. One has its origin in the period when the so-called national
states, i. e. the modern states, were first constituted, from the time
of the Bismarckian war against France. The war of 1870, which, by the
annexation of Alsace-Lorraine, threw the French Republic into the arms
of Russia, split Europe into two opposing camps and opened up a period
of insane competitive armament, first piled up the fire-brands for the
present world conflagration. Bismarck's troops were still stationed in
France when Marx wrote to the "Braunschweiger Ausschuss":

 "He who is not deafened by the momentary clamor and is not interested
in deafening the German people, must see that the war of 1870 carries
with it, of necessity, a war between Germany and Russia, just as the war
of 1866 bore the war of 1870. I say of necessity, unless the unlikely
should happen, unless a revolu-

 tion breaks out in Russia before that time. K this does not occur, a
war between Germany and Russia may even now be regarded as 'un fait
accompli.' It depends entirely upon the attitude of the German victor to
determine whether this war has been useful or dangerous. If they take
Alsace-Lorraine, then France with Russia will arm against Germany. It is
superfluous to point out the disastrous consequences."

 At that time this prophecy was laughed down. The bonds which united
Russia and Prussia seemed so strong that it was considered madness to
believe in a union of autocratic Russia with Republican France. Those
who supported this conception were laughed at as madmen. And yet
everything that Marx has prophesied has happened, to the last letter.
"For that is," says Auer in his Sedanfeier, "social-democratic politics,
seeing things clearly as they are, and difTering therein from the
day-by-day politics of the others, bowing blindly down before every
momentary success."

 This must not be misunderstood to mean that the desire for revenge for
the robbery accomplished by Bismarck has driven the French into a war
with Germany, that the kernel of the present war is to be found in the
much discussed "revenge for Alsace-Lorraine." This is the convenient
nationaHst legend of the German war agitator, who creates fables of a
darkly-brooding France that "cannot forget" its defeat, just as the
Bismarckian press-savants ranted of the dethroned Princess Austria who
could not forget her erstwhile superiority over the charming Cinderella
Prussia. As a matter of fact revenge for Alsace-Lorraine has become the
theatrical property of a couple of patriotic clowns, the "Lion de
Belfort" nothing more than an ancient survival.

 The annexation of Alsace-Lorraine long ago ceased to play a role in
French politics, being superseded by new, more pressing cares; and
neither the government nor any serious party in France thought of a war
with Germany because of these terri-

 tories. If, nevertheless, the Bismarck heritage has become the
firebrand that started this world conflagration, it is rather in the
sense of having driven Germany on the one hand, and France, and with it
all of Europe, on the other, along the downward path of military
competition, of having brought about the Franco-Russian alliance, of
having united Austria with Germany as an inevitable consequence. This
gave to Russian Czarism a tremendous prestige as a factor in European
politics. Germany and France have systematically fawned before Russia
for her favor. At that time the links were forged that united Germany
with Austria-Hungary, whose strength, as the words quoted from the
"White Book" show, lie in their "brotherhood in arms," in the present
war.

 Thus the war of 1870 brought in its wake the outward political grouping
of Europe about the axes of the Franco-German antagonism, and
established the rule of militarism in the lives of the European peoples.
Historical development has given to this rule and to this grouping an
entirely new content. The second line that leads to the present world
war, and which again brilliantly justifies Marx's prophecy, has its
origin in international occurrences that Marx did not live to see, in
the imperialist development of the last 25 years.

 The growth of capitalism, spreading out rapidly over a reconstituted
Europe after the war period of the 60s and 70s, particularly after the
long period of depression that followed the inflation and the panic of
the year 1873, reaching an unnatural zenith in the prosperity of the
90s, opened up a new period of storm and danger among the nations of
Europe. They were competing in their expansion toward the non-capitalist
countries and zones of the world. As early as the 80s a strong tendency
toward colonial expansion became apparent. England secured control of
Egypt and created for itself, in South Africa, a powerful colonial
empire. France took possession of Tunis in North Africa and Tonkin in
East Asia; Italy gained a foothold in

 Abyssinia; Russia accomplished its conquests in Central Asia and pushed
forward into Manchuria; Germany won its first colonies in Africa and in
the South Sea, and the United States joined the circle when it procured
the Phillipines with "interests" in Eastern Asia. This period of
feverish conquests has brought on, beginning with the Chinese-Japanese
War in 1895, a practically uninterrupted chain of bloody wars, reaching
its height in the great Chinese invasion, and closing with the
Russo-Japanese War of 1904.

 All these occurrences, coming blow upon blow, created new,
extra-European antagonisms on all sides: between Italy and France in
Northern Africa, between France and England in Egypt, between England
and Russia in Central Asia, between Russia and Japan in Eastern Asia,
between Japan and England in China, between the United States and Japan
in the Pacific Ocean—a very restless ocean, full of sharp conflicts and
temporary alliances, of tension and relaxation, threatening every few
years to break out into a war between European powers. It was clear to
everybody, therefore, (1) that the secret underhand war of each
capitalist nation against every other, on the backs of Asiatic and
African j)eoples must sooner or later lead to a general reckoning, that
the wind that was sown in Africa and Asia, would return to Europe as a
terrific storm, the more certainly since increased armament of the
European States was the constant associate of these Asiatic and African
occurrences; (2) that the European world war would have to come to an
outbreak as soon as the partial and changing conflicts between the
imperialist states found a centralized axis, a conflict of sufficient
magnitude to group them, for the time being, into large, opposing
factions. This situation was created by the appearance of German
imperialism.

 In Germany one may study the development of imperialism, crowded as it
was into the shortest possible space of time, in concrete form. The
unprecedented rapidity of German indus-

 trial and commercial development since the foundation of the Empire,
brought out during the 80s two characteristically peculiar forms of
capitalist accumulation; the most pronounced growth of monopoly in
Europe and the best developed and most concentrated banking system in
the whole world. The monopolies have organized the steel and iron
industry, i. e., the branch of capitalist endeavor most interested in
government orders, in militaristic equipment and in imperialistic
undertakings (railroad building, the exploitation of mines, etc.) into
the most influential factor in the nation. The latter has cemented the
money interests into a firmly organized whole, with the greatest, most
virile energy, creating a power that autocratically rules the industry,
commerce and credit of the nation, dominant in private as well as public
affairs, boundless in its powers of expansion, ever hungry for profit
and activity, impersonal, and therefore liberal-minded, reckless and
unscrupulous, international by its very nature, ordained by its
capacities to use the world as its stage.

 Germany is under a personal regime, with strong initiative and
spasmodic activity, with the weakest kind of parliamentarism, incapable
of opposition, uniting all capitalist strata in the sharpest opposition
to the working class. It is obvious that this live, unhampered
imperialism, coming upon the world stage at a time when the world was
practically divided up, with gigantic appetites, soon became an
irresponsible factor of general unrest.

 This was already foreshadowed by the radical upheaval that took place
in the military policies of the Empire at the end of 90's. At that time
two naval budgets were introduced which doubled the naval power of
Germany and provided for a naval program covering almost two decades.
This meant a sweeping change in the financial and trade policy of the
nation. In the first place, it involved a striking change in the foreign
policy of the Empire. The policy of Bismarck was founded upon the
principle that the Empire is and must remain a land power, that

 the German fleet, at best, is but a very dispensible requisite for
coastal defence. Even the secretary of state, Hollmann, declared in
March, 1897, in the Budget Commission of the Reichstag: "We need no navy
for coastal defence. Our coasts protect themselves," With the two naval
bills an entirely new program was promulgated: on land and sea, Germany
first! This marks the change from Bismarckian continental policies to
"Welt-Politik," from the defensive to the offensive as the end and aim
of Germany's military program. The language of these facts was so
unmistakable that the Reichstag itself furnished the necessary
commentary. Lieber, the leader of the Centrum at that time, spoke on the
11th of March, 1896, after a famo.us speech of the emperor on the
occasion of the 25th anniversary of the founding of the German Empire,
which had developed the new program as a forerunner to the naval bills,
in which he mentioned "shoreless naval plans" against which Germany must
be prepared to enter into active opposition. Another Centrum leader,
Schadler, cried out in the Reichstag on March 23rd, 1898, when the first
naval bill was under discussion, "The nation believes that we cannot be
first on land and first on sea. You answer, gentlemen, that is not what
we want! Nevertheless, gentlemen, you are at the beginning of such a
conception, at a very strong beginning!" When the second bill came, the
same Schadler declared in the Reischstag on the fifth of February, 1900,
referring to previous promises that there would be no further naval
bills, "and today comes this bill, which means nothing more and nothing
less than the inauguration of a world fleet, as a basis of support for
world policies, by doubling our navy and binding the next two decades by
our demands." As a matter of fact the government openly defended the
political program of its new course of action. On December 11th, 1899,
Von Buelow, at that time state secretary of the foreign office, in a
defence of the second naval bill stated, "when the English speak of *a
greater Britain,' when the French talk of *la nouvelle France,' when

 the Russians open up Asia for themselves, we too have a right to aspire
to a greater Germany. If we do not create a navy sufficient to protect
our trade, our natives in foreign lands, our missions and the safety of
our shores, we are threatening the most vital interests of our nation.
In the coming century the German people will be either the hammer or the
anvil." Strip this of its coastal defence ornamentation, and there
remains the colossal program: greater Germany, as the hammer upon other
nations.

 It is not difficult to determine the direction toward which these
provocations, in the main, were directed. Germany was to become the
rival of the world's great naval force—England. And England did not fail
to understand. The naval reform bills, and the speeches that ushered
them in, created a lively unrest in England, an unrest that has never
again subsided. In March, 1910, Lord Robert Cecil said in the House of
Commons, during a naval debate: "I challenge any man to give me a
plausible reason for the tremendous navy that Germany is building up,
other than to take up the fight against England." The fight for
supremacy on the ocean that lasted for one and a half decades on both
sides and culminated in the feverish building of dreadnoughts and
super-dreadnoughts, was, in efiFect, the war between Germany and
England. The naval bill of December 11, 1899, was a declaration of war
by Germany, which England answered on August 4, 1914.

 It should be noted that this fight for naval supremacy had nothing in
common with the economic rivalry for the world market. The English
"monopoly of the world market" which ostensibly hampered German
industrial development, so much discussed at the present time, really
belongs to the sphere of those war legends of which the ever green
French "Revanche" is ^ the most useful. This "monopoly" had become an
old time fairy tale, to the lasting regret of the English capitalists.
The industrial development of France, Belgium, Italy, Russia, India and
Japan, and above all, of Germany and America, had put an

 «

 end to this monopoly of the first half of the 19th century. Side by
side with England, one nation after another stepped into the world
market, capitalism developed automatically, and with' gigantic strides,
into world economy.

 English supremacy on the sea, which has robbed so many social-democrats
of their peaceful sleep, and which, it seems to these gentlemen, must be
destroyed to preserve international socialism, had, up to this time,
disturbed German capitalism so little that the latter was able to grow
up into a lusty youth, with bursting cheeks, under its "yoke." Yes,
England itself, and its colonies, were the cornerstone for German
industrial growth. And similarly, Germany became, for the English
nation, its most important and most necessary customer. Far from
standing in each other's way, British and German capitalist development
were mutually highly interdependent, and united by a far-reaching system
of division of labor, strongly augmented by England's free trade policy.
German trade and its interests in the world market, therefore, had
nothing whatever to do with a change of front in German politics and
with the building of its fleet.

 Nor did German colonial possessions at that time come into conflict
with the English control of the seas. German colonies were not in need
of protection by a first-class sea power. No one, certainly not England,
envied Germany her possessions. That they were taken during the war by
England and Japan, that the booty had changed owners, is but a generally
accepted war measure, just as German imperialist appetites clamor for
Belgium, a desire that no man outside of an insane asylum would have
dared to express in time of peace. Southeast and Southwest Africa,
Wilhelmsland or Tsingtau would never have caused any war, by land or by
sea, between Germany and England. In fact, just before the war broke
out, a treaty regulating a peaceable division of the Portuguese colonies
in Africa between these two nations had been practically completed.

 When Germany unfolded its banner of naval power and world policies it
announced the desire for new and far reaching conquest in the world by
German imperialism. By means of a first class aggressive navy, and by
military forces that increased in a parallel ratio, the apparatus for a
future policy was established, opening wide the doors for unprecedented
possibilities. Naval building and military armaments became the glorious
business of German industry, opening up a boundless prospect for further
operations by trust and bank capital in the whole wide world. Thus, the
acquiescence of all capitalist parties and their rallying under the flag
of imperialism was assured. The Centrum followed the example of the
National Liberals, the staunchest defenders of the steel and iron
industry, and, by adopting the naval bill it had loudly denounced in
1900, became the party of the government. The Progressives trotted after
the Centrum when the successor to the naval bill—^the high-tariff
party—came up; while the Junkers, the staunchest opponents of the
"horrid navy" and of the Canal, brought up the rear as the most
enthusiastic porkers and parasites of the very policy of sea-militarism
and colonial robbery they had so vehemently opposed. The Reichstag
election of 1907, the so-called Hottentot Elections, found the whole of
Germany in a paroxism of imperialistic enthusiasm, firmly united under
one flag, that of the Germany of von Buelow, the Germany that felt
itself ordained to play the role-of the hammer in the world. These
elections, with their spiritual progrom atmosphere, were a prelude to
the Germany of August 4th, a challenge not only to the German working
class, but to other capitalist nations as well, a challenge directed to
no one in particular, a mailed fist shaken in the face of the entire
world.

 CHAPTER IV.

 Turkey became the most important field of operations of German
imperialism; the "Deutsche Bank," with its enormous Asiatic business
interests, about which all German oriental policies center, became its
pacemaker. In the 50's and 60's Asiatic Turkey worked chiefly with
English capital, which built the railroad from Smyrna and leased the
first stretch of the Anatolian railroad, up to Ismid. In 1888 German
capital appeared upon the scene and procured from Abdul Hamid the
control of the railroad that English capital had built and the franchise
for the new stretch from Ismid to Angora and branch lines to Scutari,
Brussa, Konia and Kaizarili. In 1899 the Deutsche Bank secured
concessions for the building and operation of a harbor and improvements
in Hardar Pasha, and the sole control over trade and tariff collections
in the harbor. In 1901 the Turkish Government turned over to the
Deutsche Bank the concession for the great Bagdad railroad to the
Persian Gulf, in 1907 for the drainage of the Sea of Karaviran and the
irrigation of the Koma plain.

 The reverse of this wonderful work of "peaceful culture" is the
"peaceful" and wholesale ruin of the farming population of Asia Minor.
The cost of this tremendous undertaking was advanced, of course, by the
Deutsche Bank on the security of a widely diversified system of public
indebtedness. Turkey will be, to all eternity, the debtor of Messrs.
Siemens, Gwinner, Helfferich, etc., as it was formerly that of English,
French and Austrian capital. This debtor, now, was forced not only to
squeeze enormous sums out of the state to pay the interest on these
loans, but, in addition, to guarantee a net income upon the railway thus
built. The most modern methods of transportation were grafted upon a
primitive, in many cases purely agricultural, population. From the
unfruitful soil of farming sections that had been exploited
unscrupulously, for years, by an oriental

 despotism, producing scarcely enough to feed the jJopulation after the
huge state debts had been paid, it is practically impossible to secure
the profits demanded by the railroads. Freight and traveling are
exceedingly undeveloped, since the industrial and cultural character of
the region is most primitive, and can improve only at a slow rate. The
deficit that must be paid to raise the required profit is, therefore,
paid by the Turkish Government in the form of a so-called kilometer
guarantee. European Turkey was built up according to this system by
Austrian and French capital, and the same system has been adopted by the
Deutsche Bank in its operations in Asiatic Turkey. As bond and surety
that the subsidy will be paid, the Turkish Government has handed over to
the representatives of European capital, the so-called Executive Board
in control of public debt, the main source of Turkish national income,
which has given to the Deutsche Bank the right to collect the tithe from
a number of provinces. In this way, for instance, the Turkish Government
paid, from 1893 to 1910, for the railroad to Angora and for the line
from Eskishehir to Konia, a subsidy of about 9,000,000 Frcs. The tithes
thus leased by the Turkish Government to its European creditors are
ancient payments rendered in produce such as corn, sheep, silk, etc.
They are not collected directly but through sub-lessees, somewhat
similar to the famous tax-collectors, so notorious in pre-revolutionary
France, the state selling the right to raise the amount requjred from
each vilayet (province) by auction, against cash payment. When the
speculator or company has thus procured the right to collect the tithe
of a vilayet, it, in turn, sells the tithe of each individual sanjak
(district) to other speculators, who again divide their portion among a
veritable band of smaller agents. Since each one of these collectors
must not only cover his own expenses but secure as large a profit as
possible besides, the tithe grows like a landslide as it approaches the
farmer. If the lessee has been mistaken in his calculation, he seeks to
recompense himself at

 the expense of the farmer. The latter, practically always in debt,
waits impatiently for the time when he can sell his crop. But after his
grain is cut he must frequently wait for weeks before the tithe
collector comes to take his portion. The collector, who is usually
graindealer as well, exploits this need of the farmer whose crop
threatens to rot in the field, and persuades him to sell at a reduced
price, knowing full well that it will be easy to secure the assistance
of public officials and particularly of the muktar (town mayor) against
the dissatisfied. When no tax-collector can be found the government
itself collects the tithe in produce, puts it into storage houses and
turns it over as part payment to the capitalists. This is the inner
mechanism of the "industrial regeneration of Turkey" by European
capital.

 Thus a twofold purpose is accomplished. The farming population of Asia
Minor becomes the object of a well organized process of exploitation in
the interest of European, in this case German, financial and industrial
capital. This again promotes rhe growth of the German sphere of interest
in Turkey and lays the foundation for Turkey's "political protection."
At the same time the instrument that carries out the exploitation of the
farming population, the Turkish Government, becomes the willing tool and
vassal of Germany's foreign policies. For many year<5 Turkish finance,
tariff policies, taxation and state expenditures have been under
European control. German influence has made itself particularly felt in
the Turkish military organization.

 It is obvious from the foregoing, that the interests of German
imperialism demand the protection of the Turkish State, to the extent at
least of preventing its complete disintegration. The liquidation of
Turkey would mean its division between England, Russia, Italy, and
Greece among others and the basis for a large-scale operation by German
capital would vanish. Moreover, an extraordinary increase in the power
of Russia, England and the Mediterranean States would result. For
(jerman imperialism, therefore, the preservation of this accommodating
apparatus of

 the "independent Turkish State," the "integrity" of Turkey is a matter
of necessity. And this necessity will exist until such time as this
state will fall, having been consumed from within by German capital, as
was Egypt by England and more recently Morocco by France, into the lap
of Germany. The well known spokesman of German imperialism, Paul
Rohrbach, expressed this candidly and honestly when he said:

 "In the very nature of things Turkey, surrounded on all sides by
envious neighbors, must seek the support of a power that has practically
no territorial interests in the Orient. That power is Germany. We, on
the other hand, would be at a disadvantage if Turkey should disappear.
If Russia and England fall heir to the Turkish State, obviously it will
mean to both of these states a considerable increase in power. But even
if Turkey should be so divided that we should also secure an extensive
portion, it would mean for us endless difficulties. Russia, England, and
in a certain sense France and Italy as well, are neighbors of present
Turkish possessions and are in a position to hold and defend their
portion by land and by sea. But we have no direct connection with the
Orient. A German Asia Minor or Mesopotamia can become a reality only if
Russia, and in consequence France as well, should be forced to
relinquish their present political aims and ideals, i. e., if the
world-war should take a decisive turn in favor of German interests."—
{The War and German Policy, page 36).

 Germany swore solemnly on November 8th, 1898, in Damascus, by the
shadow of the great Saladin, to protect and to preserve the Mohammedan
world and the green flag of the Prophet, and in so doing strengthened
the regime of the bloody Sultan Abdul Hamid for over a decade. It has
been able, after a short period of estrangement, to exert the same
influence upon the Young Turk regime. Aside from conducting the
profitable business of the Deutsche Bank, the German mission busied
itself chiefly with the reorganization and training of Turkish
militarism, under

 German instructors with von der Goltz Pascha at the head. The
modernization of the army, of course, piled new burdens upon the Turkish
farmers, but it was a splendid business arrangement for Krupp and the
Deutsche Bank. At the same time Turkish militarism became entirely
dependent upon Prussian militarism, and became the centre of German
ambitions in the Mediterranean and in Asia Minor.

 That this "regeneration" of Turkey is a purely artificial attempt to
galvanize a corpse, the fate of the Turkish revolutions best shows. In
the first stage, while ideal considerations stii) predominated in the
Young Turkish movement, when it was stiU fired with ambitious plans and
illusions of a real springtime of life and of a rejuvenation for Turkey,
its political sympathies were decidedly in favor of England. This
country seemed to them to represent the ideal state of modern liberal
rule, while (Germany, which had so long played the role of protector of
the holy regime of the old sultan was felt to be its natural opponent.
For a while it seemed as if the revolution of 1908 would mc.in the
bankruptcy of German oriental policies. It seemed certain that the
overthrow of Abdul Hamid would go hand in hand with the downfall of
German influence. As the Young Turks assumed power, however, and showed
their complete inability to carry out any modern industrial, social or
national reform on a large scale, as the counter-revolutionary hoof
became more and more apparent, they turned of necessity to the tried and
proven methods of Abdul Hamid, which meant periodic bloody massacres of
oppressed peoples, goaded on until they flew at each other's throats,
boundless, truly oriental exploitation of the farming population became
the foundation of the nation. The artificial restoration of rule by
force again became the most important consideration for "Young Turkey"
and the traditional alliance of Abdul Hamid with Germany was
reestablished as the deciding factor in the foreign policy of Turkey.

 The multiplicity of national problems that threaten to dis-

 rupt the Turkish nation make its regeneration a hopeless undertaking.
The Armenian, Curdian, Syrian, Arabian, Greek, and (up to the most
recent times) the Albanian and Macedonian questions, the manifold
economic and social problems that exist in the different parts of the
realm, are a serious menace. The growth of a strong, a hopeful,
capitalism in the neighboring Balkan states and the long years of
destructive activity of international capital and international
diplomacy stamp every attempt to hold together this rotting pile of
timber as nothing but a reactionary undertaking. This has long been
apparent, particularly to the German Social-Democracy. As early as 1896,
at the time of the Cretan uprising, the German Party press was filled
with long discussions on the Oriental problem, that led to a revision of
the attitude taken by Marx at the time of the Crimean war and to the
definite repudiation of the "integrity of Turkey" as a heritage of
European reaction. Nowhere was the Young Turkish regime, its inner
sterility and its counter-revolutionary character, so quickly and so
thoroughly recognized as in the German Social-Democratic press. It was a
real Prussian idea, this building of strategic railroads for rapid
mobilization, this sending of capable military instructors to prop up
the cnmibling edifice of the Turkish State.

 In 191^ the Young Turkish regiment was forced to abdicate to the
counter-revolution. Characteristically, the first act of "Turkish
regeneration" in this war was a coup d'etat, the annihilation of the
constitution. In this respect too tTiere was a formal leturn to the rule
of Abdul Hamid.

 The first Balkan war brought bankruptcy to Turkish militarism, in spite
of German training. And the present war, into which Turkey was
precipitated as Germany's "charge," will lead, with inevitable fatality,
to the further or to the final liquidation of the Turkish Empire.

 The position of German militarism—and its essence, the interests of the
Deutsche Bank—has brought the German Empire in

 the Orient into opposition to all other nations. Above all to England.
The latter had not only rival business relations and fat profits in
Mesopotamia and Anatolia which were forced to retreat before their
German rivals. This was a situation that English capitalism grudgingly
accepted. But the building of strategic railroad, and the strengthening
of Turkish militarism under German influence was felt by England to be a
sore point, in a strategic question of its world political relations;
lying as it did at the cross roads between Central Asia, Persia and
India, on the one side, and Egypt on the other.

 "England," writes Rohrbach in his Bagdadbahn, "can be attacked and
mortally wounded on land in Egypt. The loss of Egypt will mean to
England not only the loss of control over the Suez Canal and its
connections with India and Asia, but probably the sacrifice of its
possessions in Central and Eastern Africa as well. A Mohammedan power
like Turkey, moreover, could exercise a dangerous influence over the 60
millions of Mohammedan subjects of England in India, in Afghanistan and
Persia, should Turkey conquer Egypt. But Turkey can subjugate Egypt only
if it possesses an extended system of railroads in Asia Minor and Syria,
if by an extension of the Anatalion Railway it is able to ward off an
English attack upon Mesopotamia, if it increases and improves its army,
if its general economic and financial conditions are improved."

 And in his The War and German Policies, which was published after the
outbreak of the war, he says:

 "The Bagdad Railroad was destined from the start to bring
Constantinople and .the military strongholds of the Turkish Empire in
Asia Minor into direct connection with Syria and the provinces on the
Euphrates and on the Tigris. Of course it was to be foreseen that this
railway, together with the projected and, partly or wholly, completed
railroads in Syria and Arabia, would make it possible to use Turkish
troops in the direction of Egypt. No one will deny^that, should the
Turkish-German alliance re-

 main in force, and under a number of other important conditions whose
reaHzation will be even more difficult than this alliance, the Bagdad
Railway is a political life insurance policy for Germany."

 Thus the semi-official spokesman of German imperialism openly revealed
its plan and its aims in the Orient. Here German policies were clearly
marked out, and an aggressive fundamental tendency most dangerous for
the existing balance of world power, with a clearly defined point
against England, was disclosed. German oriental policies became the
concrete commentary to the naval policy inaugurated in 1899.

 With its program for Turkish integrity, Germany came into conflict with
the Balkan states, whose historic completion and inner growth are
dependent upon the liquidation of European Turkey. It came into conflict
with Italy, finally, whose imperialistic appetite was likewise longing
for Turkish possessions. At the Morocco Conference at Algeciras in 1905,
Italy already sided with England and France. Six years later the Italian
expedition to Tripolis, which followed the Austrian annexation of Bosnia
and gave the signal for the Balkan War, already indicated a withdrawal
of Italy, foreshadowed the disruption of the Triple Alliance and the
isolation of German policies on this side as well. The other tendency of
German expansionist desires in the west became evident in the Morocco
affair. Nowhere was the negation of the Bismarck policy in Germany more
clearly shown. Bismarck, as is well known, supported the colonial
aspirations of France in order to distract its attention from
Alsace-Lorraine. The new course of Germany, on the other hand, ran
exactly counter to French colonial expansion. Conditions in Morocco were
quite different from those that prevailed in Asiatic Turkey. Germany had
few legitimate interests in Morocco. To be sure, German imperialists
pufiFed up the claims of the German firm of Mannesmann, which had made a
loan to the Moroccan sultan and demanded mining concessions in return,
into a national issue.

 But the well known fact that both of these rival groups in Morocco, the
Mannesmann as well as the Krupp-Schneider Company are a thoroughly
international mixture of German, French and Spanish capitalists,
prevents anyone from seriously speaking of a German sphere of interest.
The more symptomatic was the determination and the decisiveness with
which the German Empire, in 1905,«suddenly announced its claim to
participation in the regulation of Moroccan affairs, and protested
against French rule in Morocco. This was the first world-political clash
with France. In 1895 Germany, together with France and Russia, assumed a
threatening attitude toward victorious Japan to prevent it from
exploiting its victory over China at Shimonoseki. Five years later it
went arm in arm.with France all along the line on a plundering
expedition against China. Morocco caused a radical reorientation in
Germany's relations with France. The Morocco crisis which, in the seven
years of its duration, twice brought Europe to the verge of war between
France and Germany, was not a question of "revenge" for continental
conflicts between the two nations. An entirely new conflict had arisen,
German imperialism had come into competition with that of France. In the
end, Germany was satisfied with the French Congo region, and in
accepting this admitted that it had no special interests to protect in
Morocco itself. This very fact gave to the German attack in Morocco a
far reaching political significance. The very indefinitiveness of its
tangible aims and demands betrayed its insatiable appetite, the seeking
and feeling for prey— it was a general imperialistic declaration of war
against France. The contrast between the two nations here was brought
into the limelight. On the one hand, a slow industrial development, a
stagnant population, a nation living on its investments, concerned
chiefly with foreign financial business, burdened with a large number of
colonial possessions that it could hold together only with the utmost
difficulty. On the other hand, a mighty young giant, a capitalism
forging toward the first place among

 nations, going out into the world to hunt for colonies, English
colonies were out of the question. So the hunger of German imperialism,
besides feeding on Asiatic Turkey, turned at once to the French
heritage. The French colonies moreover were a convenient bait with which
Italy might eventually be attracted and repaid for Austrian desires of
expansion on the Balkan peninsula, and be thus more firmly welded into
the Triple Alliance by mutual business interests. The demands Germany
made upon French imperialism were exceedingly disturbing, especially
when it is remembered that Germany, once it had taken a foothold in any
part of Morocco, could at any time set fire to the entire French
North-African possessions, whose inhabitants were in a chronic state of
incipient warfare with the French conquerors, by supplying them with
ammunition. Germany's final withdrawal for suitable compensation did
away with this immediate danger. But they could not allay the general
disturbance in France and the world-political conflict that had been
created.

 Its Morocco policy not only brought Germany into conflict with France
but with England as well. Here in Morocco, in the immediate neighborhood
of Gibraltar, the second important center of world-political interests
of the British Government, the sudden appearance of German imperialism
with its demands, and the drastic impresslveness with which these
demands were supported, were regarded as a demonstration against England
as well. Furthermore the first formal protest of 1911 was directed
specifically against the agreement of 1904 between England and France
concerning Egypt and Morocco. Germany insisted briefly and definitely
that England be disregarded In all further regulations of Moroccan
aflfalrs. The effect that such a demand was certain to have on
German-English relations is obvious. The situation was commented upon in
the Frankfurter Zeitung of November 8, 1911, by a London correspondent:

 "This is the outcome: a million negroes in Congo, a great katzenjammer
and a furious resentment against perfides Albion.

 The katzenjammer Germany will live down. But what is to become of our
relations with England? As they stand today matters are untenable.
According to every historic probability they will either lead to
something worse, that is war, or they will have to be speedily patched
up. . . The trip of the Panther was, as a Berlin correspondent so well
said in the Frankfurter Zeitung the other day, a dig into the ribs of
France to show that Germany is still here. . . Concerning the effect
that this event would create here, Berlin cannot possibly entertain the
slightest doubt. Certainly no correspondent in London was for a moment
in doubt that England would stand energetically on the side of France.
How can the Norddeutsche Allgemeine Zeitung still insist that Germany
must treat with France alone? For several hundred years Europe has been
the scene of a steadily increasing interweaving of political interests.
The misfortune of one, according to the laws of politics, fills some
with joy, others with apprehension. When two years ago Austria had its
difficulties with Russia, Germany appeared upon the scene with
shimmering armor, although Vienna, as was afterwards stated, would have
preferred to settle matters without German intervention. It is very
unlikely that England, having just emerged from a period of anti-German
feeling, should consider that our dealings with France are none of- its
business. In the last analysis, it was a question of might; for a dig in
the ribs, be it ever so friendly, is a very tangible matter. For no one
can be quite sure when a blow on the teeth may follow. Since then the
situation has become less critical. At the moment when Lloyd George
spoke, the danger of a war between Germany and England was acute. Are we
justified in expecting a different attitude from Sir Edward Grey after
the policies that he and his followers have been pursuing? If Berlin
entertained such ideas then it seems to me that the German foreign
policies have been weighed and found wanting."

 Thus did our imperialistic policies create sharp conflicts in

 Asia Minor and in Morocco, between England and Germany, between Germany
and France. But what of German relations with Russia? In the murderous
spirit that took possession of the German public during the first weeks
of the war everything seemed credible. The German populace believed that
Belgian women had gouged out the eyes of the German wounded, that
Cossacks ate tallow candles, that they had taken infants by the legs and
torn them to pieces; they believed that Russia aspired to the annexation
of the German empire, to the destruction of German "Kultur," to the
introduction of absolutism from Kiel to Munich, from the Warthe to the
Rhine. The Social-Democratic Chemnitzer Volksstimme wrote on August 2nd:

 "At this moment we all feel it our duty to fight first against the
Russian knout. German women and children shall not become the victims of
Russian bestiality, German territory must not fall into the hands of the
cossacks. For if the Entente is victorious, not the French Republicans,
but the Russian Tsar will rule over Germany. In this moment we defend
everything that we possess of German culture and German freedom against
a pitiless and barbarous foe."

 On the same day the Fraenkische Tagespost cried out:

 "Shall the cossacks, who have already taken possession of our border
towns, in their onrush on our country, bring destruction to our cities?
Shall the Russian Czar, whose love of peace the Social-Democrats refused
to trust even on the day when his peace manifesto was published, who is
the worst enemy of the Russian people themselves, rule over one man of
German blood?"

 And the Koenigsberger Volksseitung wrote on August 3rd:

 "Not one of us can doubt, whether he is liable for military service or
not, that he must do everything to keep these worthless vandals from our
borders so long as the war may last. For if they should be victorious,
thousands of our comrades will be condemned to horrible prison
sentences. Under the Russian scepter there is no such thing as
self-expression of the people, no social-democratic press is allowed to
exist, social-democratic meetings and organizations are pro-

 hibited. We cannot conceive for a moment the possibility of a Russian
victory. While still upholding our opposition to war, we will all work
together to protect ourselves against these vandals that rule the
Russian nation."

 We shall later enter a little more fully into the relations that exist
between German culture and Russian Czarism. They form a chapter by
itself in the position of the German Social-Democracy on the war. This
much may be said now, one might with as much justification assume that
the Czar desires to annex Europe, or the moon, as to speak of his desire
to annex Germany. In the present war only two nations are threatened in
their national existence, Belgium and Servia. While we howled about
safeguarding the national existence of Germany, our cannon were directed
against these two states. It is impossible to discuss with people who
still believe in the possibilrty of ritual murder. But to those who do
not act from mob instinct, who do not think in terms of clumsy slogans
that are invented to catch the rabble, who guide their thoughts by
historic facts, it must be obvious that Russian Czarism cannot have such
intentions. Russia is ruled by desperate criminals, but not by maniacs.
And after all, the policies of absolutism, in spite of all their
characteristic differences, have this similarity in all nations, that
they live not on thin air but upon very real possibilities, in a realm
where concrete things come into the closest contact with each other. We
need have no fear of the arrest of our German comrades and their
banishment to Siberia, nor of the introduction of Russian absolutism
into Germany. For the statesmen of the bloody Czar, with all their
mental inferiority, have a clearer materialistic conception of the
situation than some of our party editors. These statesmen know very well
that political forms of government cannot be "introduced" anywhere and
everywhere according to the desire of the rulers; they know full well
that every form of government is the outcome of certain economic and
social foundations, they know from bitter experience that even in Russia
itself conditions

 are almost beyond their power to control; they know, finally, that
reaction in every country can use only the forms that are in accord with
the nature of the country, and that the absolutism that is in accord
with our class and party conditions is the Hohen-zollern police state
and the Prussian three-class electoral system. A dispassionate
consideration of the whole situation will show that we need not fear
that Russian Czarism, even if it should win a complete victory over
Germany, would feel called upon to do away with these products of German
culture.

 In reality the conflicts that exist between Germany and Russia are of
an entirely different nature. These differences are not to be found in
the field of inner politics. Quite the contrary: their mutual tendencies
and internal relationships have established a century-old traditional
friendship between the two nations. But in spite of and notwithstanding
their solidarity on questions of inner policy, they have come to blows
in the field of foreign, world-political hunting grounds.

 Russian imperialism, like that of western nations, consists of widely
diversified elements. Its strongest strain is not, however, as in
Germany or England, the economic expansion of capital, hungry for
territorial accumulation, but the political interests of the nation. To
be sure, Russian industry can show a considerable export to the Orient,
to China, Persia and Central Asia, and the Czarist Government seeks to
encourage this export trade because it furnishes a desirable foundation
for its sphere of interest. But national policies here play an active,
not a passive, role. On the one hand, the traditional tendencies of a
conquest-loving Czardom, ruling over a mighty nation whose population
today consists of 173 millions of human beings, demand free access to
the ocean, to the Pacific Ocean on the East, to the Mediterranean on the
South, for industrial as well as for strategic reasons. On the other
hand, the very existence of absolutism, and the necessity of holding a
respected place in the world-political field, and finally the need of
financial credit in

 foreign countries, without which Czarism cannot exist, all play their
important part. We must add to these, as in every other monarchy, the
dynastic interest. Foreign prestige and temporary forgetfulness of inner
problems and difficulties are well known family remedies in the art of
ruling, when a conflict arises between the government and the great mass
of the people.

 But modem capitalist interests are becoming more and more a factor in
the imperialist aims of the Czarist nation. Russian capitalism, still in
its earliest youth, cannot hope to perfect its development under an
absolutist regime. On the whole it has advanced little beyond the
primitive stage of home industry. But it sees a gigantic future before
its eyes in the exploitation of the nation's natural resources. As soon
as Russia's absolutism is swept away, of this there can be no doubt,
Russia will develop rapidly into the foremost capitalist nation,
provided always that the international situation will give it the time
necessary for such development. It is this hope, and the appetite for
foreign markets that will mean increased capitalistic development even
at the present time, that has filled the Russian bourgeoisie with
imperialistic desires and led them to eagerly voice their demands in the
coming division of the world's resources. This historic desire is
actively supported by very tangible immediate interests. There are, in
the first place, the armament industry and its purveyors. In the second
place the conflicts with the "enemy within," the revolutionary
proletariat, have given to the Russian bourgeoisie an increased
appreciation of the powers of militarism and the distracting effects of
a world-political evangel. It has bound together the various capitalist
groups and the nobility under one counter-revolutionary regime. The
imperialism of bourgeois Russia, particularly among the Liberals, has
grown enormously in the stormy atmosphere of the revolutionary period,
and has given to the traditional foreign policies of the Romanoffs a
modern stamp. Chief among the aims of the traditional policies of
monarchic Russia, as well as of the more modern appetites of

 the Russian bourgeoisie, are the Dardanelles. They are, according to
the famous remark made by Bismarck, the latchkey to the Russian
possessions on the Black Sea. Since the eighteenth century, Russia has
waged a number of bloody wars against Turkey, has undertaken its mission
as the liberator of the Balkans, for the realization of this goal. For
this ideal, Russia has piled up mountains of dead in Ismael, in Navarin,
in Sinope, Silistria and Sebastopol, in Plevna and Shipka. To the
Russian muzhik, the defense of his Slavic and Christian brothers from
the horrors of Turkish oppression has become as potent a war legend as
the defense of German culture and freedom against the horrors of Russia
has become to the German Social-Democracy.

 But the Russian bourgeoisie also was much more enthusiastic over the
Mediterranean prospect than for its Manchurian and Mongolian "mission."
The liberal bourgeoisie of Russia criticised the Japanese war so
severely as a senseless adventure, because it distracted the attention
of Russian politics from the problem that was to them more important,
the Balkans. And in another way, the unfortunate war with Japan had the
same effect. The extension of Russian power into Eastern and Central
Asia, lo Thibet and down Into Persia necessarily aroused a feeling of
discomfort in the minds of English imperialists. England, fearing for
its enormous Indian empire, viewed the Asiatic movements of Russia with
growing suspicion. In fact, at the beginning of the present century the
English-Russian conflict in Asia was the strongest world-conflict in the
international situation. Moreover this will be, in all probability, the
most critical issue in future world-political developments when the
present war is over. The crushing defeat of Russia in 1904 and the
subsequent outbreak of the Russian revolution only temporarily changed
the situation. The apparent weakening of the empire of the Czar brought
about a relaxation of the tension between England and Russia. In 1907 a
treaty was signed between the two nations providing for a mutual control
of Persia that estab-

 lished, for the time being, friendly and neighborly relations in
Central Asia. This kept Russia from undertaking great projects in the
East, and her energies reverted all the more vigorously to their old
occupation, Balkan politics. Here the Russia of the Czar came for the
first time into sharp conflict with German culture, after a century of
faithful and well-founded friendship. The road to the Dardanelles leads
over the corpse of Turkey. But for more than a decade Germany has
regarded the "integrity" of this corpse as its most important
world-political task. Russian methods in the Balkans had changed at
various times. Embittered by the ingratitude of the liberated Balkan
Slavs who tried to escape from their position as vassals to the Czarist
Government, Russia for a time supported the program of Turkish integrity
with the silent understanding that the division of that country should
be postponed to some more auspicious time. But today the final
liquidation of Turkey coincides with the plans of both Russian and
English politics. The latter aims to unite Arabia and Mesopotamia, and
the Russian territories that lie between Egypt and India, under British
rule, into a great Mohammedan empire, thus conserving its own position
in India and Egypt. In this way Russian imperialism, as in earlier times
English imperialism, came into opposition with that of Germany. For this
privileged exploiter of Turkish disintegration had taken up her position
as sentinel on the Bosphorus.

 Russian interests came to a clash in the Balkans not only directly with
Germany but with Austria as well. Austrian imperialism is the political
complement of German imperialism, at the same time its Siamese twin
brother and its fate.

 Germany, having isolated herself on all sides by her world policy, has
in Austria her only ally. The alliance with Austria is old, having been
founded by Bismarck in 1879. But since that time it has completely
changed its character. Like the enmity toward France, the alliance with
Austria received an entirely new content through the development of the
last decades. In 1879

 its chief purpose was the mutual defense of the possessions gained in
'the wars of 1864-1870. The Bismarck Triple Alliance was conservative in
character, especially since it signified Austria's final renunciation of
admission to the German federation of states, its acceptance of the
state of aflfairs created by Bismarck, and the military hegemony of
Greater Prussia, The Balkan aspirations of Austria were as distasteful
to Bismarck as the South-African conquests of Germany. In his Gedanken
und Erin-nerungen he says:

 "It is natural that the inhabitants of the Danube region should have
needs and aspirations that extend beyorid the present boundaries of
their monarchy. The German national constitution points out the way
along which Austria can form a union of the political and material
interests that exist between the most eastern Rumanian tribe and the Bay
of Cattaro. But the duty of the German Empire does not demand that it
satisfy the desires of its neighbors for increased territory with the
blood and wealth of its subjects."

 He expressed the same thought still more drastically when he uttered
the well known sentiment that, to him, the whole of Bosnia was not worth
the bone of a Pomeranian grenadier. Indeed, a treaty drawn up with
Russia in 1884 proves conclusively that Bismarck never desired to place
the Triple Alliance at the service of Austrian annexationist desires. By
this treaty, the German Empire promised, in the event of a war between
Austria and, Russia, not to support the former, but rather to observe a
"benevolent neutrality."

 But since imperialism has taken hold of German politics, its relations
to Austria have changed as well. Austria-Hungary lies between Germany
and the Balkan, in other words, on the road over the critical point in
German Oriental politics. To make Austria its enemy at this time would
mean complete isolation, and complete abdication by Grermany of its
world-political plan.

 But the weakening of Austria, which would signify the final liquidation
of Turkey, with a consequent strengthening of Russia, the Balkan States,
and England, would probably accomplish the national unification of
Germany, but would, at the same time, wipe out, forever, its
imperialistic aspirations. The safety of the Hapsburg monarchy has
therefore logically become a necessary complement to German imperialism,
the preservation of Turkey its chief problem.

 But Austria means a constant latent state of war in the Balkans. For
Turkish disintegration has promoted the existence and growth of the
Balkan States in the immediate neighborhood of the Hapsburg monarchy,
and the resulting state of chronic incipient warfare. Obviously the
existence of virile and independent national states on the border of a
monarchy that is made up- of fragments of these same nationalities,
which it can rule only by the whip-lash of dictatorship must hasten its
downfall. Austrian Balkan politics and particularly its Serbian
relations have plainly revealed its inner decay. Although its
imperialistic appetites wavered between Saloniki and Durazzo, Austria
was not in a position to annex Servia, even before the latter had grown
in strength and size through the two Balkan wars. For the forcible
annexation of Servia would have dangerously strengthened in its interior
one of the most refractory South Slavic nationalities, a people that
even now, because of Austria's stupid regime of reaction, can scarcely
be held in check. But neither can Austria tolerate the normal
independent development of Servia or profit from it by normal commercial
relations. For the Habsburg monarchy is not the political expression of
a capitalist state, but a loose syndicate of a few parasitic cliques,
striving to grasp everything within reach, utilizing the political
power? of the nation so long as this weak edifice still stands. For the
benefit of Hungarian agrarians, and for the purpose of increasing the
prices of agricultural products, Austria has forbidden

 Servia to send cattle and fruits into Austria, thus depriving this
nation of farmers of its most important market. In the interests of
Austrian monopoUes it has forced Servia to import industrial products
exclusively from Austria, and at the highest prices. To keep Servia in a
state of economic and political dependence, it prevented Servia from
imiting on the East with Bulgaria, to secure access to the Black Sea,
and from securing access to the Adriatic, on the West, by prohibiting
the acquisition of a harbor in Albania. In short, the Balkan policy of
Austria was nothing more than a barefaced attempt to choke off Servia.
Also, it was directed against the establishment of mutual relations
between, and against the inner growth of the Balkan States, and was,
therefore, a constant menace for them.

 Austrian imperialism constantly threatened the existence and
development of the Balkan States; now by the annexation of Bosnia, now
by its demands upon the Sanjak of Novibazar and on Saloniki, now by its
encroachments upon the Albanian coast. To satisfy these tendencies on
the part of Austria, and to meet the competition of Italy as well, the
caricature of an independent Albania under the rule of a German nobleman
was created after the second Balkan war, a country which was, from the
first hour, little more than the plaything of the intrigues of
imperialistic rivals.

 Thus the imperialistic policies of Austria during the last decade were
a constant hindrance to the normal progressive development of the
Balkans, and led to the inevitable alternative: either the Habsburg
monarchy or the capitalist development of the Balkan States.

 Emancipated from Turkish rule, the Balkan now faced its new hindrance,
Austria, and the necessity of removing it from its path. Historically
the liquidation of Austria-Hungary is the logical sequence of Turkish
disintegration, and both are in direct line with the process of
historical development.

 There was but one solution: war—a world war. For behind Servia stood
Russia, unable to sacrifice its influence in the Balkans and its role of
"protector" without giving up its whole im-perialisitc program in the
Orient as well. In direct conflict with Austrian politics, Russia aimed
to unite the Balkan States under a Russian protectorate, to be sure. The
Balkan union that had almost completely annihilated European Turkey in
the victorious war of 1912 was the work of Russia, and was directly and
intentionally aimed against Austria. Inspite of Russian efforts, the
Balkan union was smashed in the second Balkan war. But Servia, emerging
the victor, became dependent upon the friendship of Russia in the same
degree as Austria had become Russia's bitter enemy. Germany, whose fate
was firmly linked to that of the Habsburg monarchy, was obliged to back
up the stupid Balkan policy of the latter, step by step, and was thus
brought into a doubly aggravated opposition to Russia.

 But the Balkan policies of Austria, furthermore, brought Austria into
conflict with Italy, which was actively interested in the dissolution of
the Turkish and Austrian Empires. The imperialism of Italy has found in
the Italian possessions of Austria a most popular cloak for its own
annexationist desires. Its eyes are directed especially toward the.
Albanian coast of the Adriatic, should a new regulation of Balkan
affairs take place. The Triple Alliance, having already sustained a
severe blow in the Tnpoli-tan war, was destroyed by the acute crisis in
the Balkans durmg the two Balkan wars. The Central Powers were thus
brought into conflict with the entire outside world. German imperialism,
chained to two decaying corpses, was steering its course directly toward
a world war.

 Moreover, Germany embarked upon this course with a full realization of
its consequences. Austria, as the motive power, was rushing blindly into
destruction. Its clique of clerical-mili-tarist rulers with the Archduke
Franz Ferdinand and his right

 hand man Baron von Chlumezki at the head, fairly jumped at every excuse
to strike the first blow. In 1909 Austria framed up the famous documents
by Professor Friedmann, exposing what purported to be a widespread,
criminal conspiracy of the Serbs against the Habsburg monarchy, for the
sole purpose of infusing the German nations with the necessary
war-enthusiasm. These papers had only one slight drawback—they were
forced from beginning to end. A year later the rumor of the hc-rible
martyrdom of the Austrian consul Prohaska in Ueskub was buii-ly spread
for days to serve as the spark that would ignite the keg of powder,
while Prohaska roamed unmolested and happy through the streets of
Ueskub. Then came the assassination at Serajewo, a long desired, truly
shameful crime. "If ever a blood sacrifice has had a lib^erating,
releasing effect, it was the case here," rejoiced the spokesman of
German imperiaHsm. Among Austrian imperialists the rejoicing was still
greater, and they decided to use the noble corpses while they were still
warm. After a hurried conference with Berlin, war was virtually decided
and the ultimatum sent out as a flaming torch that was to set fire to
the capitalist world at all four comers.

 But the occurrence at Serajewo only furnished the immediate pretext.
Causes and conflicts for the war had been overripe for a long time. The
conjuncture that we witness today was ready a decade ago. Every year,
every political occurrence of recent years has but served to bring war a
step nearer: the Turkish revolution, the annexation of Bosnia, the
Morocco crisis, the Tripolis expedition, the two Balkan wars. All
military bills of the last years were drawn up in direct preparation for
this war; the countries of Europe were preparing, witli open eyes, for
the inevitable final contest. Five times during recent years this war
was on the verge of an outbreak: in the summer of 1905, when Germany for
the first time made her decisive demands in the Morocco crisis; in the
summer of 1908, when England, Rus-

 sia and France threatened with war after the conference of the monarchs
in Reval over the Macedonian question, and war was prevented only by the
sudden outbreak of the Turkish revolution; jn the beginning of 1909 when
Russia replied to the Bosnian annexation with a mobilization, when
Germany in Petersburg formally declared its readiness to go to war on
the side of Austria; in the summer of 1911 when the "Panther" was sent
to Agadir, an act that would certainly have brought on war if Germany
had not finally acquiesced in the Morocco question and allowed itself to
be compensated with the Congo concession; and finally, in the beginning
of 1913, when Germany, in view of the proposed Russian invasion of
Albania, a second time threatened Petersburg with its readiness for
warlike measures.

 Thus the world war has been hanging fire for eight years. It was
postponed again and again only because always one of the two sides in
question was not yet ready with its military preparations.

 So, for instance, the present world war was imminent at the time of the
"Panther" adventure in 1911—without a murdered Grand Duke, without
French fliers over Nuremberg, without a Russian invasion into East
Prussia. Germany simply put it off for a more favorable moment—one need
only read the frank explanation of a German imperialist: "The German
government has been accused by the so-called pan-Germans of weakness in
the Morocco crisis in 1911." Let them disabuse their minds of this false
impression. It is a fact that, at the time when we sent the "Panther" to
Agadir, the reconstruction of the North-East Sea Canal was still in
progress, that building operations on Helgoland for the construction of
a great fort were nowhere near completion, that our fleet of
dreadnoughts and accessories, in comparison with the English sea power,
was in a far more unfavorable position than was the case three years
later.

 Compared to the present time, 1914, the canal as well as Helgo-

 land were in a deplorable state of unreadiness, were partially
absolutely useless for war purposes. Under such circumstances, where one
knows that one's chances will be far more favorable in a few years, it
would be worse than foolish to provoke a war. First the German fleet had
to be put in order; the great military bill had to be pushed through the
Reichstag. In the summer of 1914 Germany was prepared for war, while
France was still laboring over its three years military service program,
while in Russia neither the army nor the naval program were ready. It
was up to Germany to utilize the auspicious moment."

 The same Rohrbach, who is not only the most serious representative of
imperialism in Germany, but is also in intimate touch with the leading
circles m German politics and is their semi-official mouthpiece,
comments upon the situation in July, 1914, as follows. "At this time
there was only one danger, that we might be morally forced, by an
apparent acquiescence on the part of Russia, to wait until Russia and
France were really prepared." In other words, Germany feared nothing so
much as that Russia might give in. "With deep pain we saw our untiring
efforts to preserve world peace shipwrecked, etc., etc."

 The invasion of Belgium, therefore, and the accomplished fact of war
was not a bolt from the blue. It did not create a new, unheard of
situation. Nor was it an event that came, in its political associations,
as a complete surprise to the social-democratic group. The world war
that began officially on August 4th, 1914, was the same world war toward
which German imperialism had been driving for decades, the same war
whose coming the Social-Democracy had prophesied year after year. This
same war has been denounced by social-democratic parliamentarians,
newspapers and leaflets a thousand times as a frivolous imperialistic
crime, as a war that is against every interest of culture and against
every interest of the nation.

 And, indeed, not the "existence and the independent develop-

 ment of Germany in this war" are at stake, inrjpite of ^iie reiura
tions of the social-democratic press, but the immediate profits of the
"Deutsche Bank" in Asiatic Turkey and the future profits of the
"Mannesmann" and "Krupp" interests in Morocco, the existence and the
reactionary character of Austria, "this heap of or-iganized decay, that
calls itself the Habsburg monarchy," as the "Vorwaerts" wrote on the
25th of July, 1914; Hungarian pigs and prunes, paragraph 14, the
"Kultur" of Friedmann-Prohaska, the existence of Turkish rule in Asia
Minor and of counter-revolution on the Balkan.

 Our party press was filled with moral indignation over the fact that
Germany's foes should drive black men and barbarians, Negroes, Sikhs and
Maoris into the war. Yet these peoples play a role in this war that is
approximately identical with that played by the socialist proletariat in
the European states. If the Maoris of New Zealand were eager to risk
their skulls for the English king, they showed only as much
understanding of their own interests as the German Social-Democratic
group that traded the existence, the freedom and the civilization of the
German people for the existence of the Habsburg monarchy, for Turkey and
for the vaults of the "Deutsche Bank."

 One difference there is between the two. A generation ago, Maori
negroes were still cannibals and not students of Marxian philosophy.

 CHAPTER V.

 But Czarism! In the first moments of the war this was undoubtedly the
factor that decided the position of our party. In its declaration, the
social-democratic group had given the slogan: Against Czarism! And out
of this the socialist press has made a fight for European culture.

 The Frankfurter Volksstimme wrote on July 31:

 "The German Social-Democracy has always hated Czardom as the bloody
guardian of European reaction: From the time that Marx and Engels
followed, with far-seeing eyes, every movement of this barbarian
government, down to the present day, where its prisons are filled with
political prisoners, and yet it trembles before every labor movement.
The time has come when we must square accounts with these terrible
scoundrels, under the German flag of war."

 The Pfaelzische Post of Ludwighafen wrote on the same day:

 "This is a principle that was first established by our August Bebel.
This is the struggle of civilization against barbarism, and in this
struggle the proletariat will do its share."

 The Muenchener Post of August ist:

 "When it comes to defending our country against the bloody Czardom we
will not be made citizens of the second class."

 The Halle Volkshlatt wrote on August 5th:

 "If this is so, if we have been attacked by Russia, and everything
seems to corroborate this statement—then the Social-Democracy, as a
matter of course, must vote in favor of all means of defense. With all
our strength we must fight to drive Czarism from our country!"

 And on August i8th:

 "Now that the die is cast in favor of the sword, it is not only

 the duty of national defense and national existence that puts the
weapon into our hands as into the hands of every German, but also the
realization that in the enemy whom we are fighting in the east we are
striking a blow at the foe of all culture and all progress. . . . The
overthrow of Russia is synonymous with the victory of freedom in Europe.
. . "

 On August 5th, the Braunschweiger Volksfreund wrote:

 "The irresistible force of military preparation drives everything
before it. But the class-conscious labor movement obeys, not an outside
force, but its own conviction, when it defends the ground upon which it
stands, from attack in the east."

 The Essener Arbeiterzeitung cried out on August 3rd:

 "If this country is threatened by Russia's determination, then the
Social-Democrats, since the fight is against Russian Blood-Czarism,
against the perpetrator of a million crimes against f ree;-dom and
culture, will allow none to excell them in the fulfilment of their duty,
in their willingness to sacrifice. Down with Czar-ism! Down with the
home of Barbarism! Let that be our slogan!"

 Similarly the Bielef elder Volkswacht writes on August 4th:

 "Everywhere the same cry: against Russian Despotism and faithlessness."

 The Elberfeld party-organ on August 5th:

 "All western Europe is vitally interested in the extermination of
rotten murderous Czarism. But this human interest is crushed by the
greed of England and France to check the profits that have been made
possible by German capital."

 The Rheinische Zeitung in Cologne:

 "Do your duty, friends, wherever fate may place you. You are fighting
for the civilization of Europe, for the independence of your fatherland,
for your own welfare."

 The Schleswig-Holstein Volkszeitung of August 7th writes:

 "Of course we are living in an age of capitalism. Of course we will
continue to have class struggles after the great war is over. But these
class struggles will be fought out in a freer state, they will be far
more confined to the economic field than before. In the future the
treatment of Socialists as outcasts, as citizens of the second class, as
politically rightless will be impossible, once the Czardom of Russia has
vanished."

 On August nth, the Hamburger Echo cried:

 "We are fighting to defend ourselves not so much against England and
France as against Czarism. But this war we carry on with the greatest
enthusiasm, for it is the war for civilization."

 And the Luebeck party-organ declared, as late as September 4th:

 "If European liberty is saved, then Europe will have German arms to
thank for it. Our fight is a fight against the worst enemy of all
liberty and all democracy."

 Thus the chorus of the German party press sounded and resounded.

 In the beginning of the war the German government accepted the
proffered assistance. Nonchalantly it fastened the laurels of the
liberator of European culture to its helmet. Yes, it endeavored to carry
through the role of the "liberator of nations," though often with
visible discomfort and rather awkward grace. It flattered the Poles and
the Jews in Russia, and egged one nation on against the other, using the
policies that had proven so successful in their colonial warfare, where
again and again they played up one chief against the other. And the
Social-Democrats followed each leap and bound of German imperialism with
remarkable agility. While the Reichstag group covered up every shameful
outrage with a discrete silence the social-democratic press filled the
air with jubilant melodies, rejoicing in the liberty that "German
riflebutts" had brought to the poor victims of Czarism.

 Even the theoretical organ of the party, the Neue Zeit, wrote on the
28th of August:

 "The border population of the "little father's" realm greeted the
coming of the German, troops with cries of joy. For these Poles and Jews
have but one conception of their fatherland, that of corruption and rule
by the knout. Poor devils, really father-landless creatures, these
downtrodden subjects of bloody Nicholas. Even should they desire to do
so, they could find nothing to defend but their chains. And so they live
and toil, hoping and longing that Grerman rifles, carried by German men,
will crush the whole Czarist system. ... A clear and definite purpose
still lives in the German working-class, though the thunder of a
world-war is crashing over its head. It will defend itself from the
allies of Russian barbarism in the west to bring about an honorable
peace. It will give to the task of destroying Czarism the last breath of
man and beast."

 After the social-democratic group had stamped the war as a war of
defense for the German nation and European culture, the
social-democratic press proceeded to hail it as the "savior of the
oppressed nations." Hindenburg became the executor of Marx and Engels.

 The memory of our party has played it a shabby trick. It forgot all its
principles, its pledges, the decision of international congresses just
at the moment when they should have found their application. And to its
great misfortune, it remembered the heritage of Karl Marx and dug it out
of the dust of passing years at the very moment when it could serve only
to decorate Prussian militarism, for whose destruction Karl Marx was
willing to sacrifice "the last breath of man and beast." Long forgotten
chords that were sounded by Marx in the Neue Rheini-sche Zeitung against
the vassal state of Nicholas I, during the German March Revolution of
1848, suddenly reawakened in the ears of the German Social-Democracy in
the year of Our Lord

 1914, and called them to arms, arm in arm with Prussian jun-kerdom
against the Russia of the Great Revolution of 1905.

 This is where a revision should have been made; the s'ogan^• of the
March Revolution should have been brought into accord with the
historical experiences of the last seventy years.

 In 1848 Russia Czarism was, in truth, "the guardian of European
reaction." The product of Russian social conditions, firmly rooted in
its medieval, agricultural state, absolutism was the protector and at
the same time the mighty director of monarchical reaction. This was
weakened, particularly in Germany, where a system of small states still
obtained. As late as 1851 it was possible for Nicholas I, to assure
Berlin through the Prussian consul von Rochow "that he would, indeed,
have been pleased to see the revolution destroyed to the roots when
general von Wrangel advanced upon Berlin in November, 1848." At another
time, in a warning to Manteuffel, the Czar stated, "that he relied upon
the Imperial Ministry, under the leadership of His Highness, to defend
the rights of the crown against the chambers, and give to the principles
of conservatism their due." It was possible for the same Nicholas I to
bestow the Alexander Nevski order on a Prussian Ministerial President in
recognition of his "constant efforts ... to maintain legal order in
Prussia."

 The Crimean war worked a noticeable change in this respect. It ended
with the military and therefore with the political bankruptcy of the old
system. Russian absolutism was forced to grant reforms, to modernize its
rule, to adjust itself to capitalist conditions. In so doing, it gave
its little finger to the devil who already holds it firmly by the arm,
and will eventually get it altogether. The Crimean War was, by the way,
an instructive example of the kind of liberation that can be brought to
a downtrodden people "at the point of the gun." The military overthrow
at Sedan brought France its republic. But this republic was not the

 gift of the Bismarck soldiery. Prussia at that time, as today, can give
to other peoples nothing but its own junker rule. The republican France
was the ripe fruit of inner social struggles and of the three
revolutions that had preceded it. The crash at Sebastopol was in effect
similar to that of Jena, But because there was no revolutionary movement
in Russia, it led to the outward renovation and reaifirmation of the old
regime.

 But the reforms that opened the road for capitalist development in
Russia during the 6o's were possible only with the money of a capitalist
system. This money was furnished by western European capital. It came
from Germany and France, and has created a new relationship that has
lasted down to the present day. Russian absolutism is now subsidized by
the western European bourgeoisie. No longer does the Russian Ruble "roll
in diplomatic chambers" as Prince William of Prussia bitterly complained
in 1854, "into the very chambers of the King." On the contrary, German
and French money is rolling to Petersburg to feed a regime that would
long ago have breathed its last without this life-giving juice. Russian
Czarism is today no longer the product of Russian conditions; its root
lies in the capitalist conditions of western Europe. And the
relationship is shifting from decate to decade. In the same measure as
the old root of Russian absolutism in Russia itself is being destroyed,
the new, west-European root is growing stronger and stronger. Besides
lending their financial support, Germany and France, since 1870, have
been vieing with each other to lend Russia their political support as
well. As revolutionary forces arise from the womb of the Russian people
itself to fight against Russian absolutism, they meet with an ever
growing resistence in western Europe, which stands ready to lend to
threatened Czarism its moral and political support. So when, in the
beginning of the 8o's the older Russian socialist movement severely
shook the Czarist government and partly destroyed its authority within
and without, Bis-

 marck made his treaty with Russia and strengthened its position in
international politics.

 Capitalist development, tenderly nurtured by Czarism with its own
hands, finally bore fruit: in the 90's the revolutionary movement of the
Russian proletariat began. The erstwhile "guardian of reaction" was
forced to grant a meaningsless constitution, to seek a new protector
from the rising flood in its own country. And it found this protector—in
Germany. The Germany of Bue-low must pay the debt of gratitude that the
Prussia of Wrangei and Manteuffel had incurred. Relations were
completely reversed. Russian support against the revolution in Germany
is superseded by German aid against the revolution in Russia. Spies,
outrages, betrayals—a demagogic agitation, like that which blessed the
times of the Holy Alliance, was unleashed in Germany against the
fighters for the cause of Russian freedom, and followed them to the very
doorsteps of the Russian Revolution. In the Koenigs-berg trial of 1904
this wave of persecution was at its height. This trial threw a scathing
light upon a whole historical development since 1848 and showed the
complete change of relations between Russian absolutism and European
reaction. "Tua res agitur!" cried a Prussian Minister of Justice to the
ruling classes of Germany, pointing to the tottering foundation of the
Czarist regime. "The establishment of a democratic republic in Russia
would strongly influence Germany," declared First District-Attorney
Schulze in Koenigsberg. "When my neighbor's home burns my own is also in
danger." And his assistant Casper also emphasized : "it is naturally not
indifferent to Germany's public interests whether this bulwark of
absolutism stands or falls. Certainly the flames of a revolutionary
movement may easily spring over into Germany. . ."

 The Revolution was overthrown, but the very causes that led to its
temporary downfall are valuable in a discussion of the position taken by
the German Social-Democracy in this war. That

 the Russian uprising in 1905-1906 was unsuccessful inspite of its
(.unequalled expenditure of revolutionary force, its clearness of
purpose and tenacity, can be ascribed to two distinct causes. The One
lies in the inner character of the Revolution itself, in its enormous
historical program, in the mass of economic and political problems that
it was forced to face. Some of them, for instance, the agrarian problem,
cannot possibly be solved within capitalist society. There was the
difficulty, furthermore, of creating a class-state for the supremacy of
the modern bourgeoisie against the counter-revolutionary opposition of
the bourgeoisie as a whole. To the onlooker it would seem that the
Russian Revolution was doomed to failure because it was a proletarian
revolution with bourgeois duties and problems, or if you wish, a
bourgeois revolution waged by socialist proletarian methods, a crash of
two generations amid lightning and thunder, the fruit of the delayed
industrial development of class conditions in Russia and their
overripeness in western Europe. From this point of view its downfall in
1906 signifies not its bankruptcy, but the natural closing of the first
chapter, upon which the second must follow with the inevitability of a
natural law. The second cause was of external nature: it lay in western
Europe: European reaction once more hastened to help its endangered
protege. Not with lead and bullets, although "German guns" were in
German fists even in 1905 and only waited for a signal from Petersburg
to attack the neighboring Poles. Europe rendered an assistance that was
equally valuable: financial subsidy and political alliances were
arranged to help Czarism in Russia. French money paid for the armed
forces that broke down the Russian Revolution; from Germany came moral
and political support that helped the Russian government to clamber out
from the depths of shame into which Japanese torpedoes and Russian
proletarian fists had thrust it. In 1910, in Potsdam, official Germany
received Russian Czarism with open arms. The reception of the
bloodstained monarch at

 U THE CRISIS

 the gates of the German capital was not only the German blessing for
the throttling of Persia, but above all for the hangman's work of the
Russian counter-revolution. It was the official banquet of German and
Europeon Kultur over what they believed to be the grave of the Russian
Revolution.

 And strange! At that time, when this challenging feast upon the grave
of the Russian Revolution was held in its own home, the German
Social-Democracy remained silent, and had completely forgotten "the
heritage of our masters" from 1848. At that time, when the hangman was
received in Potsdam, not a sound, not a protest, not an article vetoed
this expression of solidarity with the Russian counter-revolution. Only
since this war has begun, since the police permits it, the smallest
party organ intoxicates itself with bloodthirsty attacks upon the
hangman of Russian liberty. Yet nothing could have disclosed more
clearly than did this triumphal tour of the Czar in 1910, that the
oppressed Russian proletariat was the victim not only of domestic
reaction but of western European reaction as well. Their fight, like
that of the March revolutionists in 1848, was against reaction, not only
in their own country, but against its guardians in all other European
countries.

 After the inhuman crusades of the counter-revolution had somewhat
subsided, the revolutionary ferment in the Russian proletariat once more
became active. The flood began to rise and to boil. Economic strikes in
Russia, according to the official reports, involved 46,623 workers and
256,386 days in 1910; 96,730 workers and 768,556 days in 1911; and
89,771 workers and 1,214,881 days in the first five months of 1912.
Political mass-strikes, protests and demonstrations comprised 1,005,000
workers in 1912, 1,272,000 in 1913. In 1914 the flood rose higher and
higher. On January 22nd, the anniversary of the beginning of the
Revolution there was a demonstration mass-strike of 200,000

 workers. As in the days before the revolution in 1905, the flame broke
out in June, in the Caucasus. In Baku, 40,000 workers were on a general
strike. The flames leaped over to Petersburg. On the 17th of June 80,000
workers in Petersburg laid down their tools, on the 20th of July,
200,000 were out, July 23rd, the gene-rat strike movement was spreading
out all over Russia, barricades were being built, the revolution was on
its way. A few more months and it would have come, its flags fluttering
in the wind. A few more years, and perhaps the whole world-political
constellation would have been changed, imperialism, perhaps, would have
received a firm check in its mad impulse.

 But German reaction checked the revolutionary movement. From Berlin and
Vienna came declarations of war, and the Russian revolution was buried
beneath its wreckage. "German guns" are shattering, not Czarism, but its
most dangerous enemy. The hopefully fluttering flag of the revolution
sank down amid a wild whirlpool of war. But it sank honorably, and it
will rise again out of the horrible massacre, in spite of "Grerman g^s,"
in spite of victory or defeat for Russia on the battlefields.

 The national revolts in Russia which the Germans tried to foster, too,
were unsuccessful. The Russian provinces were evidently less inclined to
fall for the bait of Hindenburg's cohorts than the German
Social-Democracy. The Jews, practical people that they are, were able to
count out on their fingers that "German fists" which have been unable to
overthrow their own Prussian reaction can hardly be expected to smash
Russian absolutism. The Poles, exposed to the tripleheaded war, were not
in the position to answer their "liberators" in audible language. But
they will have remembered that Polish children were taught to pray the
Lord's prayer in the German language with bloody welts on their backs,
will not have forgotten the liberality of Prussian anti-Polish laws. All
of them, Poles, Jews and Russians had no

 difficulty in understanding that the "German gun," when it descends
upon their heads, brings not hberty, but death.

 To couple the legend of Russian liberation with its Marxian heritage is
worse than a poor joke on the part of the German Social-Democracy. It is
a crime. To Marx, the Russian revolution was a turning point in the
history of the world. Every political and historical perspective was
made dependent upon the one consideration, "provided the Russian
revolution has not already broken out." Marx believed in the Russian
revolution and expected it even at a time when Russia was only a state
of vassals. When the war broke out the Russian revolution had occurred.
Its first attempt had not been victorious; but it could not be ignored;
it is on the order of the day. And yet our German Social-Democrats came
with "German guns," declaring the Russian revolution null and void;
struck it from the pages of History. In 1848 Marx spoke from the German
barricades; in Russia there was hopeless reaction. In 1914 Russia was in
the throes of a revolution; while its German "liberators" were cowed by
the fists of Prussian junkerdom.

 But the liberating mission of the German armies was only an episode.
German imperialism soon raised its uncomfortable mask and turned openly
against France and England. Here, too, it was supported valiantly by a
large number of the party papers. They ceased railing against the bloody
Czar, and held up "perfidious Albion" and its merchant soul to the
public disdain. They set out to free Europe, no longer from Russian
absolutism, but from English naval supremacy. The hopeless confusion in
which the party had become entangled, found a drastic illustration in
the desperate attempt made by the more thoughtful portion of our
party-press to meet this new change of front. In vain they tried to
force the war back into its original channels, to nail it down to the
"heritage of our masters"—that is, to the

 myth that they, the Social-Democracy—^had themselves created "With
heavy heart I have been forced to mobilize the army against a neighbor
at whose side I have fought on so many battlefields. With honest sorrow
I saw a friendship, truly served by Germany, break." That was simple,
open, honest. But when the rhetoric of the first weeks of war backed
down before the lapidary language of imperialism, the German
Social-Democracy lost its only plausible excuse.

 CHAPTER VI.

 Of equal importance in the attitude of the Social-Democracy was the
official adoption of a program of civil peace, i. e, the cessation of
the class struggle for the duration of the war. The declaration that was
read by the Social-Democratic group in the Reichstag on the fourth of
August had been agreed upon in advance with representatives of the
government and the capitalist parties. It was little more than a
patriotic grand-stand play, prepared behind the scenes and delivered for
the benefit of the people at home and in other nations.

 To the leading elements in the labor movement, the vote in favor of the
war credits by the Reichstag group was a cue for the immediate
settlement of all labor controversies. Nay more, they announced this to
the manufacturers as a patriotic duty incurred by labor when it agreed
to observe a civil peace. These same labor leaders undertook to supply
city labor to farmers in order to assure a prompt harvest. The leaders
of the Social-Democratic women's movement united with capitalist women
for "National service" and placed the most important elements that
remained after the mobilization at the disposal of national Samaritan
work. Socialist women worked in soup kitchens and on advisory
commissions instead of carrying on agitation work for the party. Under
the socialist exception laws the party had utilized parliamentary
elections to spread its agitation and to keep a firm hold upon the
population in spite of the state of siege that had been declared against
the party and the persecution of the socialist press. In this crisis the
social-democratic movement has voluntarily relinquished all propaganda
and education in the interest of the proletarian class struggle, during
Reichstag and Landtag elections. Parliamentary elections have everywhere
been reduced to the simple bourgeois formula; the catching of

 votes for the candidates of the party on the basis of an amicable and
peaceful settlement with its capitalist opponents. When the
social-democratic representatives in the Landtag and in the municipal
commissions—with the laudable exceptions of the Prussian and the
Alsatian Landtag—with high sounding references to the existing state of
civil peace, voted their approval of the war credits that had been
demanded, it only emphasized how completely the party had broken with
things as they were before the war. The social-democratic press, with a
few exceptions, proclaimed the principle of national unity as the
highest duty of the German people. It warned the people not to withdraw
their funds from the savings banks lest by so doing they unbalance the
economic life of the nation, and hinder the savings banks in liberally
buying war-loan bonds. It pleaded with proletarian women that they
should spare their husbands at the front the tales of suffering which
they and their children were being forced to undergo, to bear in silence
the neglect of the government, to cheer the fighting warriors with happy
stories of family life and favorable reports of prompt assistance
through government agencies. They rejoiced that the educational work
that had been conducted for so many years in and through the labor
movement had become a "conspicuous asset in conducting the war.
Something of this spirit the following example will show:

 "A friend in need is a friend indeed. This old adage has once more
proven its soundness. The social-democratic proletariat that has been
prosecuted and clubbed for its opinions went, like one man, to protect
our homes. German labor unions that had so often suffered both in
Germany and in Prussia report unanimously that the best of their members
have joined the colors. Even capitalist papers like the General-Anzeiger
note the fact and express the conviction that "these people" will do
their duty as well as any man, that blows will rain most heavily where
they stand."

 "As for us, we are convinced that our labor unionists can do

 more than deal out blows. Modern mass armies have by no means
simplified the work of their generals. It is practically impossible to
move forward large troop divisions in close marching order under the
deadly fire of modem artillery. Ranks must be carefully widened, must be
more accurately controlled. Modern warfare requires discipline and
clearness of vision not only in the divisions but in every individual
soldier. The war will show how vastly human material has been improved
by the educational work of the labor unions, how well their activity
will serve the nation in these times of awful stress. The Russian and
the French soldier may be capable of marvelous deeds of bravery. But in
cool collected consideration none will surpass the German labor
unionists. Then too, many of our organized workers know the ways and
by-ways of the border land as well as they know their own pockets, and
not a few of them are accomplished linguists. The Prussian advance in
1866 has been termed a schoolmasters' victory. This will be a victory of
labor union leaders." (Frankfurter Volksstimme, August 18, 1914).

 In the same strain the Neue Zeit, the theoretical organ of the party,
declared (No. 23, Sept. 25, 1914) :

 "Until the question of victory or defeat has been decided, all doubts
must disappear, even as to the causes of the war. Today there can be no
difference of party, class and nationality within the army or the
population."

 And in No. 8, Nov. 27, 1914, the same Neue Zeit declared in a chapter
on "The Limitations of the International":

 "The world war divides the socialists of the world into different camps
and especially into different national camps. The International cannot
prevent this. In other words, the International ceases to be an
effective instrument in times of war. It is, on the whole, a peace
instrument. Its great historic problem is the struggle for peace and the
class struggle in times of peace."

 Briefly, therefore, beginning with the fourth of August until

 the day when peace shall be declared, the social-democracy has declared
the class struggle extinct. The first thunder of Krupp cannoiis in
Belgium welded Germany into a wonderland of class solidarity and social
harmony.

 How is this miracle to be understood? The class struggle is known to be
not a social-democratic invention that can be arbitrarily set aside for
a period of time whenever it may seem convenient to do so. The
proletarian class struggle is older than the social-democracy, is an
elementary product of class society. It flamed up all over Europe when
capitalism first came into power. The modern proletariat was not led by
the social-democracy into the class struggle. On the contrary, the
international social-democratic movement was called into being by the
class struggle -to bring a conscious aim and unity into the various
local and scattered fragments of the class struggle. What then changed
in this respect when the war broke out ? Have private property,
capitalist exploitation and class rule ceased to exist? Or have the
propertied classes in a spell of patriotic fervor declared: in view of
the needs of the war we hereby turn over the means of production, the
earth, the factories and the mills thereon, into the possession of the
people? Have they relinquished the right to make profits out of these
possessions? Have they set aside all political privileges, will they
sacrifice them upon the altar of the fatherland, now that it is in
danger? It is, to say the least, a rather naive hypothesis, and sounds
almost like a story from a kindergarten primer. And yet the declaration
of our official leaders that the class struggle has been suspended,
permits no other interpretation. Of course nothing of the sort has
occurred. Property rights, exploitation and class rule, even political
oppression in all its Prussian thoroughness have remained intact. The
cannon in Belgium and in Eastern Prussia have not had the slightest
influence upon the fundamental social and political structure of
Germany.

 a^ THE CRISIS

 The cessation of the class struggle was, therefore, a deplorably
one-sided affair. While capitalist oppression and exploitation, the
worst enemies of the working class remain, socialist and labor union
leaders have generously delivered the working class, without a struggle,
into the hands of the enemy for the duration of the war. While the
ruling classes are fully armed with the property and supremacy rights,
the working class, at the advice of the Social-Democracy has laid down
its arms.

 Once before, in 1848 in France, the proletariat experienced this
miracle of class harmony, this fraternity of all classes of a modem
capitalist state of society. In his "Class Struggles in France," Karl
Marx writes: In the eyes of the proletariat, who confused the moneyed
aristocracy with the bourgeoisie, in the imagination of republican
idealists, who denied the very existence of classes, or attributed them
to a monarchical form of government, in the deceitful phrases of those
bourgeois who had hitherto been excluded from power, the rule of the
bourgeoisie was ended when the republic was proclaimed. At that time all
royalists became republican, all millionaires in Paris became laborers.
In the word "Fraternity," the brotherhood of man, this imaginary
destruction of classes found official expression. This comfortable
abstraction from class differences, this sentimental balancing of class
interests, this Utopian disregard of the class struggle, this
"Fraternity" was the real slogan of the February revolution. . . The
Parisian proletariat rejoiced in an orgy of brotherhood. . . The
Parisian proletariat, looking upon the republic as its own creation,
naturally acclaimed every act of the provisional bourgeois government.
Willingly it permitted Caus-sidiere to use its members as policemen to
protect the property of Paris. With unquestioning faith it allowed Louis
Blanc to regulate wage differences betwen workers and masters. In their
eyes it was a matter of honor to preserve the fair name of the republic
before the peoples of Europe."

 Thus in February, 1848, a naive Parisian proletariat set aside the
class struggle. But let us not forget that even they committed this
mistake only after the July monarchy had been crushed by their
revolutionary action, after a republic had been established. The fourth
of August, 1914, is an inverted February revolution: It is the setting
aside of class differences, not under a republic, but under a military
monarchy, not after a victory of the people over reaction, but after a
victory of reaction over the people, not with the proclamation of
"Libert^, Egalite, Fraternite," but with the proclamation of a state of
siege, after the press had been choked and the constitution annihilated.

 Impressively the government of Germany proclaimed a civil peace.
Solemnly the parties promised to abide by it. But as experienced
politicians these gentlemen know full well that it is fatal to trust too
much to promises. They secured civil peace for themselves by the very
real measure of a military dictatorship. This too the social-democratic
group accepted without protest or opposition. In the declarations of
August fourth and December second there is not a syllable of indignation
over the affront contained in the proclamation of military rule. When it
voted for civil peace and war credits, the social-democracy silently
gave its consent to military rule as well, and laid itself, bound and
gagged, at the feet of the ruling classes. The declaration of military
rule was purely an anti-socialist measure. From no other side were
resistance, protest, action, and difficulties to be expected. As a
reward for its capitulation the social-democracy merely received what it
would have received under any circumstances, even after an unsuccessful
resistance, namely military rule. The impressive declaration of the
Reichstag group emphasizes the old socialist principle of the right of
nations to self-determination, as an explanation of their vote in favor
of war credits. Self-determination for the German proletariat was the
straight-jacket of a state of siege. Never in the histor)' of the world
has a party made itself more ridiculous.

 But more! In refuting the existence of the class struggle, the
social-democracy has denied the very basis of its own existence. What is
the very breath of its body, if not the class struggle? What role could
it expect to play in the war, once having sacrificed the class struggle,
the fundamental principle of its existence? The social-democracy has
destroyed its mission, for the period of the war, as an active political
party, as a representative of working class politics. It has thrown
aside the most important weapon it possessed, the power of criticism of
the war from the peculiar point of view of the working class. Its only
mission now is to play the role of the gendarme over the working class
under a state of military rule.

 German freedom, that same German freedom for which, according to the
declaration of the Reichstag group, Krupp cannons are now fighting, has
been endangered by this attitude of the social-democracy far beyond the
period of the present war. The leaders of the Social-Democracy are
convinced that democratic liberties for the working class will come as a
reward for its allegiance to the fatherland. But never in the history of
the world has an oppressed class received political rights as a reward
for service rendered to the ruling classes. History is full of examples
of shameful deceit on the part of the ruling classes, even when solemn
promises were made before the war broke out. The Social-Democracy has
not assured the extension of liberty in Germany. It has sacrificed those
liberties that the working class possessed before the war broke out. The
indifference with which the German people have allowed themselves to be
deprived of the freedom of the press, of the right of assembly and of
public life, the fact that they not only calmly bore, but even applauded
the state of siege, is unexampled in the history of modern society. In
England the freedom of the press has nowhere been violated, in France
there is incomparably more freedom of public opinion than in Germany. In
no country has public opinion so

 completely vanished, nowhere has it been so completely superseded by
official opinion, by the order of the government, as in Germany. Even in
Russia there is only the destructive work of a public censor who
effectively wipes out opposition of opinion. But not even there have
they descended to the custom of providing articles ready for the press
to the opposition papers. In no other country has the government forced
the opposition press to express in its columns the politics that have
been dictated and ordered by the government in "Confidential
Conferences." Such measures were unknown even in Germany during the war
of 1870. At that time the press enjoyed unlimited freedom, and
accompanied the events of the war, to Bismarck's active resentment, with
criticism that was often exceedingly sharp. The newspapers were full of
active discussion on war aims, on questions of annexation, and
constitutionality. When Johann Jacobi was arrested, a storm of
indignation swept over Germany, so that even Bismarck felt obliged to
disavow all responsibility for this "mistake" of the powers of reaction.
Such was the situation in Germany at a time when Bebel and Liebknecht,
in the name of the German working class, had declined all community of
interests with the ruling jingoes. It took a Social-Democracy with four
and one-half million votes to conceive of the touching "Burgfrieden," to
assent to war credits, to bring upon us the worst military dictatorship
that was ever suffered to exist. That such a thing is possible in
Germany to-day, that not only the bourgeois press, but the highly
developed and influential socialist press as well permits these things
without even the pretence of opposition bears a fatal significance for
the future of Germany liberty. It proves that society in Germany to-day
has within itself no foundation for political freedom, since it allows
itself to be thus lightly deprived of its most sacred rights. Let us not
forget that the political rights that existed in Germany before the war
were not won, as were those of France and England, in great and re-

 peated revolutionary struggles, are not firmly anchored in the lives of
the people by the power of revolutionary tradition. They are the gift of
a Bismarckian policy granted after a period of victorious counter -
revolution that lasted over twenty years. German liberties did not ripen
on the field of revolution, they are the product of diplomatic gambling
by Prussian military monarchy, they are the cement with which this
military monarchy has united the present German empire. Danger threatens
the free development of German freedom not, as the German Reichstag
group believe, from Russia, but in Germany itself. It lies in the
peculiar counter-revolutionary origin of the German constitution, and
looms dark in the reactionary powers that have controlled the German
state since the empire was founded, conducting a silent but relentless
war against these pitiful "German liberties." The Junkers of east of the
Elbe, the business jingoes, the arch-reactionaries of the Center, the
degraded "German liberals," the personal rulership, the sway of the
sword, the Zabem policy, that triumphed all over Germany before the war
broke out, these are the real enemies of culture and liberty, and the
war, the state of siege and the attitude of the social democracy, are
strengthening the powers of darkness all over the land. The Liberal, to
be sure, can explain away this graveyard quiet in Germany with a
characteristically liberal explanation; to him it is only a temporary
sacrifice, for the duration of the war. But to a people that is
politically ripe, a sacrifice of its rights and its public life, even
temporarily, is as impossible as for a human being to give up, for a
time, his right to breathe. A people that gives silent consent to
military government in times of war thereby admits that political
independence at any time is superfluous. The passive submission of the
Social Democracy to the present state of siege and its vote for war
credits without attaching the slightest condition thereto, its
acceptance of a civil peace, has demoralized the masses, the only
existing pillar of German

 constitutional government, has strengthened the reaction of its rulers,
the enemies of constitutional government.

 By sacrificing the class struggle our party has moreover, once and for
all, given up the possibility of making its influence effectively felt
in determining the extent of the war and the terms of peace. To its own
official declaration, its acts have been a stinging blow. While
protesting against all annexations, which are, after all, the logical
consequences of an imperialistic war that is successful from the
military point of view, it has handed over every weapon that the working
class possessed that might have empowered the masses to mobilize public
opinion in their own direction, to exert an effective pressure upon the
terms of war and of peace. By assuring militarism of peace and quiet at
home the Social Democracy has given its military rulers permission to
follow their own course without even considering the interests of the
masses, has unleashed in the hearts of the ruling classes the most
unbridled imperialistic tendencies. In other words, when the Social
Democracy adopted its platform of civil peace, and the political
disarmament of the working class, it condemned its own demand of no
annexations to impotency.

 Thus the Social Democracy has added another crime to the heavy burden
it already has to bear, namely the lengthening of the war. The commonly
accepted dogma that we can oppose the war only so long as it is
threatened, has become a dangerous trap. As an inevitable consequence,
once the war has come, social democratic political action is at an end.
There can be, then, but one question, victory or defeat, i. e., the
class struggle must stop for the period of the war. But actually the
greatest problem for the political movement of the Social Democracy
begins only after the war has broken out. At the international
congresses held in Stuttgart in 1907 and in Basel in 1912, the German
party and labor union leaders unanimously voted in favor of a resolution
which says:

 "Should war nevertheless break out, it shall be the duty of the
Social-Democracy to work for a speedy peace, and to strive with every
means in its power to utilize the industrial and political crisis to
accomplish the awakening of the people, thus hastening the overthrow of
capitalist class rule".

 What has the Social-Democracy done in this war? Exactly the contrary.
By voting in favor of war credits and entering upon a civil peace, it
has striven, by all the means in its power, to prevent the industrial
and political crisis, to prevent an awakening of the masses by the war.
It strives "with all the means in its power" to save the capitalist
state from its own anarchy, to reduce the nimiber of its victims. It is
claimed—we have often heard this argument used by Reichstag
deputies—that not one man less would have fallen upon the battle fields
if the Social Democratic group had voted against the war credits. Our
party press has steadfastly maintained that we must support and join in
the defence of our country in order to reduce the number of bloody
victims that this war shall cost. But the policy that we have followed
out has had exactly the opposite effect. In the first place, thanks to
the civil peace, and the patriotic attitude of the Social Democracy, the
imperialistic war unleashed its furies without fear. Hitherto, fear of
restiveness at home, fear of the fury of the hungry populace, have been
a load upon the minds of the ruling classes that effectively checked
them in their bellicose desires. In the well known words of Buelow:
"they are trying to put off the war chiefly because they fear the Social
Democracy". Rohrbach says in his "Krieg und die Deutsche Politik", page
7, "unless elemental catastrophies intervene, the only power that can
force (jermany to make peace is the hunger of the breadless". Obviously
he meant a hunger that attracts attention, that forces itself
unpleasantly upon the ruling classes in order to force them to pay heed
to its demands. Let us see.

 finally, what a prominent military theoretician, General Bern-hardi,
says, in his great work "Vom Heutigen Kriege." "Thus modem mass armies
make war difficult for a variety of reasons. Moreover they constitute,
in and of themselves, a danger that must never be underestimated.

 "The mechanism of such an army is so huge and so complicated that it
can remain efficient and flexible only so long as its cogs and wheels
work, in the main, dependably, and obvious moral confusion is carefully
prevented. These are things that cannot be completely avoided, as little
as we can conduct a war exclusively with victorious battles. They can be
overcome if they appear only within certain restricted limits. But when
great, compact masses once shake off their leaders, when a spirit of
panic becomes widespread, when a lack of sustenance becomes extensively
felt, when the spirit of revolt spreads out among the masses of the
army, then the army becomes not only ineffectual against the enemy, it
becomes a menace to itself and to its leaders. When the army bursts the
bands of discipline, when it voluntarily interrupts the course of
military operation, it creates problems that its leaders are unable to
solve.

 "War, with its modern mass armies is, under all circumstances, a
dangerous game, a game that demands the greatest possible personal and
financial sacrifice the state can offer. Under such circumstances it is
clear that provision must be made everywhere that the war, once it has
broken out, be brought to an end as quickly as possible, to release the
extreme tension that must accompany this supreme effort on the part of
whole nations."

 Thus capitalist politicians and military authorities alike believe war,
with its modem mass armies, to be a dangerous game. And therein lay for
the Social Democracy the most effectual op-

 portunity, to prevent the rulers of the present day from precipitating
war and to force them to end it as rapidly as possible. But the position
of the Social Democracy in this war cleared away all doubts, has torn
down the dams that held back the storm-flood of militarism. In fact it
has created a power for which neither Bemhardi nor any other capitalist
statesman dared hope in his wildest dreams. From the camp of the
social-democrats came the cry: "Durchhalten", i. e., a continuation of
this human slaughter. And so the thousands of victims that have fallen
for months on the battlefields lie upon our conscience.

 CHAPTER VII.

 "But since we have been unable to prevent the war, since it has come in
spite of us, and our country is facing invasion, shall we leave our
country defenseless! Shall we deliver it into the hands of the enemy?
Does not Socialism demand the right of nations to determine their own
destinies ? Does it not mean that every people is justified, nay more,
is in duty bound, to protect its liberties, its independence? 'When the
house is on fire, shall we not first try to put out the blaze before
stopping to ascertain the incendiary?' "

 These arguments have been repeated, again and again in defense of the
attitude of the Social-Democracy, in Germany and in France.

 Even in the neutral countries this argument has been used. Translated
into Dutch we read for instance: "When the ship leaks must we not seek,
first of all, to stop the hole?"

 To be sure. Fie upon a people that capitulates before invasion and fie
upon a party that capitulates before the enemy within.

 But there is one thing that the fireman in the burning house has
forgotten: that in the mouth of a Socialist the phrase "Defending one's
fatherland" cannot mean playing the role of cannon fodder under the
command of an imperialistic bourgeoisie.

 Is an invasion really the horror of all horrors, before which all class
conflict within the country must subside as though spellbound by some
supernatural witchcraft ? According to the police theory of bourgeois
patriotism and military rule, every evidence of the class struggle is a
crime against the interests of the country because they maintain that it
constitutes a weakening of the stamina of the nation. The
Social-Democracy has allowed itself to be perverted into this same
distorted point of view. Has not

 the history of modern capitaHst society shown that in the eyes of
capitalist society, foreign invasion is by no means the unmitigated
terror as which it is generally painted; that on the contrary it is a
measure to which the bourgeoisie has frequently and gladly resorted as
an effective weapon against the enemy within? Did not the Bourbons and
the aristocrats of France invite foreign invasion against the Jacobites?
Did not the Austrian counterrevolution in 1849 call out the French
invaders against Rome, the Russian against Budapest? Did not the "Party
of Law and Order" in France in 1850 openly threaten an invasion of the
Cossacks in order to bring the national assembly to terms ? And was not
the Bonaparte army released, and the support of the Prussian army
against the Paris Commune assured, by the famous contract between Jules
Favre, Thiers and Co., and Bismarck? This historical evidence led Karl
Marx, 45 years ago, to expose the "national wars" of modern capitalist
society as miserable frauds. In his famous address to the General
Council of the International on the downfall of the Paris Commune, he
said:

 "That, after the greatest war of modern times the belligerent armies,
the victor and the vanquished, should unite for the mutual butchery of
the proletariat—this incredible event proves, not as Bismarck would have
us believe, the final overthrow of the new social power—but the complete
disintegration of the old bourgeois society. The highest heroic
accomplishment of which the old order is capable, is the national war.
And this has now proved to be a fraud perpetrated by government for no
other purpose than to put off the class struggle, a fraud that is bared
as soon as the class struggle flares up in a civil war. Class rule can
no longer hide behind a national unifonn. The national governments are
united against the proletariat."

 In capitalist history, invasion and class struggle are not oppo-sites,
as the official legend would have us believe, but one is the means and
the expression of the other. Just as invasion is the

 true and tried weapon in the hands of capital against the class
struggle, so on the other hand the fearless pursuit of the class
struggle has always proven the most effective preventative of foreign
invasions. On the brink of modem times are the examples of the Italian
cities, Florence, and Milano, with their century of bitter struggle
against the Hohenstaufen. The stormy history of these cities, torn by
inner conflicts, proves that the force and the fury of inner class
struggles not only does not weaken the defensive powers of the
community, but that on the contrary, from their fires shoot the only
flames that are strong enough to withstand every attack from a foreign
foe.

 But the classic example of our own times is the great French
Revolution. In T793 Paris, the heart of France, was surrounded by
enemies. And yet Paris and France at that time did not succumb to the
invasion of a stormy flood of European coalition; on the contrary, it
welded its force in the face of the growing danger, to a more gigantic
opposition. If France, at that critical time, was able to meet each new
coalition of the enemy with a new miraculous loosening of the inmost
forces of society in the great miraculous and undiminished fighting
spirit, it was only because of the impetuous loosening of the inmost
forces of society in the great struggle of the classes of France. Today,
in the perspective of a century, it is clearly discernible that only
this intensification of the class struggle, that only the Dictatorship
of the French people and their fearless radicalism, could produce means
and forces out of the soil of France, sufficient to defend and to
sustain a newborn society against a world of enemies, against the
intrigues of a dynasty, against the traitorous machinations of the
aristocrats, against the attempts of the clergy, against the treachery
of their generals, against the opposition of sixty departments and
provincial capitals, and against the united armies and navies of
monarchial Europe. The centuries have proven that not the state of
siege, but relentless class struggle is the power that awakens the
spirit of self-sacrifice, the moral strength of the masses, that

 the class struggle is the best protection and the best defense against
a foreign enemy.

 This same tragic quidproquo victimized the Social-Democracy when it
based its attitude in this war upon the doctrine of the right of
national self-determination.

 It is true that Socialism gives to every people the right of
independence and the freedom of independent control of its own
destinies. But it is a veritable perversion of Socialism to regard
present day capitalist society as the expression of this
self-determination of nations. Where is there a nation in which the
people have had the right to determine the form and conditions of their
national, political and social existence? In Germany the determination
of the people found concrete expression in the demands formulated by the
G«rman revolutionary democrats of 1848; the first fighters of the German
proletariat, Marx, Engels, Lassalle, Bebel and Liebknecht, proclaimed
and fought for a united German Republic. For this ideal the
revolutionary forces in Berlin and in Vienna, in those tragic days of
March, shed their heart's blood upon the barricades. To carry out this
program, Marx and Engels demanded that Prussia take up arms against
Czar-ism. The foremost demand made in the national program was for the
liquidation of "the heap of organized decay, the Hapsburg monarchy," as
well as of two dozen other dwarf monarchies within Germany itself. The
overthrow of the German revolution, the treachery of the German
bourgeoisie to its own democratic ideals, led to the Bismarck regime and
to its creature, present-day Greater Prussia, twenty-five fatherlands
under one helm, the German empire. Modern Germany is built upon the
grave of the March Revolution, upon the wreckage of the right of
self-determination of the German people. The present war, supporting
Turkey and the Hapsburg monarchy, and strengthening German military
autocracy is a second burial of the March revolutionists, and of the
national program of the German people.

 It is a fiendish jest of history that the Social-Democrats, the heirs
of the German patriots of 1848, should go forth in this war with the
banner of "self-determination of nations" held aloft in their hands.
But, perhaps the third French Republic, with its colonial possessions in
four continents and its colonial horrors in two, is the expression of
the self-determination of the French nation ? Or the British nation,
with its India, with its South African rule of a million whites over a
population of five million colored people? Or perhaps Turkey, or the
Empire of the Czar?

 Capitalist polfticians, in whose eyes the rulers of the people and the
ruling classes are the nation, can honestly speak of the "right of
national self-determination" in connection with such colonial empires.
To the Socialist, no nation is free whose national existence is based
upon the enslavement of another people, for to him colonial peoples,
too, are human beings, and, as such, parts of the national state.
International Socialism recognizes the right of free independent
nations, with equal rights. But Socialism alone can create such nations,
can bring self-determination of their peoples. This slogan of Socialism
is like all its others, not an apology for existing conditions, but a
guide-post, a spur for the revolutionary, regenerative, active policy of
the proletariat. So long as capitalist states exist, i. e., so long as
imperialistic world policies determine and regulate the inner and the
outer life of a nation, there can be no "national self-determination"
either in war or in peace.

 In the present imperialistic milieu there can be no wars of national
self-defense. Every socialist policy that depends upon this determining
historic milieu, that is willing to fix its policies in the world
whirlpool from the point of view of a single nation is built upon a
foundation of sand.

 We have already attempted to show the background for the present
conflict between Germany and her opponents. It was necessary to show up
more clearly the actual forces and relations

 that constitute the motive power behind the present war, because this
legend of the defense of the existence, the freedom and civiHzation of
Germany plays an important part in the attitude of our group in the
Reichstag and our Socialist press. Against this legend historical truth
must be emphasized to show that this is a war. that has been prepared by
German militarism and its world-political ideas for years, that it was
brought about in the Summer of 1914, by Austrian and German diplomacy,
with a full realization of its import.

 In a discussion of the general causes of the war, and of its
significance, the question of the "guilty party" is completely beside
the issue. Germany certainly has not the right to speak of a war of
defense, but France and England have little more justification. They
too, are protecting, not their national, but their world-political
existence, their old imperialistic possessions, from the attacks of the
German upstart. Doubtless the raids of German and Austrian imperialism
in the Orient started the conflagration, but French imperialism, by
devouring Morocco, and English imperialism, in its attempts to rape
Mesopotamia, and all the other measures that were calculated to secure
its rule of force in India, Russia's Baltic policies, aiming toward
Constantinople, all of these factors have carried together and piled up,
brand for brand, the firewood that feeds the conflagration. If
capitalist armaments have played an important role as the mainspring
that times the outbreak of the catastrophe, it was a competition of
armaments in all nations. And if Germany laid the cornerstone for
European competitive armaments by Bismarck's policy of 1870, this policy
was furthered by that of the second Empire and by the military-colonial
policies of the third empire, by its expansions in East Asia and in
Africa.

 The French Socialists have some slight foundation for their illusion of
"national defense," because neither the French government nor the French
people entertained the slightest warlike desires in July 1914. "Today
everyone in France is honestly.

 uprightly and without reservation for peace," insisted Jaures in the
last speech of his life, on the eve of the war, when he addressed a
meeting in the People's House in Brussels. This was absolutely true, and
gives the psychological explanation for the indignation of the French
Socialists when this criminal war was forced upon their country. But
this fact was not sufficient to determine the Socialist attitude on the
world war as an historic occurrence.

 The events that bore the present war did not begin in July 1914 but
reach back for decades. Thread by thread they have been woven together
on the loom of an inexorable natural development, until the firm net of
imperialist world politics has encircled five continents. It is a huge
historical complex of eyents, whose roots reach deep down into the
Plutonic deeps of economic creation, whose outermost branches spread out
and point away into a dimly dawning new world, events before whose
all-embracing immensity, the conception of guilt and retribution, of
defense and offense, sink into pale nothingness.

 Imperialism is not the creation of any one or of any group of states.
It is the product of a particular stage of ripeness in the world
development of capital, an innately international condition, an
indivisible whole, that is recognizable only in all its relations, and
from which no nation can hold aloof at will. From this point of view
only is it possible to understand correctly the question of "national
defense" in the present war.

 The national state, national unity and independence were the
ideological shield under which the capitalist nations of central Europe
constituted themselves in the past century. Capitalism is incompatible
with economic and political divisions, with the accompanying splitting
up into small states. It needs for its development large, united
territories, and a state of mental and intellectual development in the
nation that will lift the demands and needs of society to a plane
corresponding to the prevailing

 stage of capitalistic production, and to the mechanism of modern
capitalist class rule. Before capitalism could develop, it sought to
create for itself a territory sharply defined by national limitations.
This program was carried out only in France at the time of the great
revolution, for in the national and political heritage left to Europe by
the feudal middle ages, this could be accomplished only by revolutionary
measures. In the rest of Europe this nationalization, like the
revolutionary movement as a whole, remained the patchwork of half-kept
promises. The German empire, modern Italy, Austria-Hungary, and Turkey,
the Russian Empire and the British world-empire, are all living proofs
of this fact. The national program could play a historic role only so
long as it represented the ideological expression of a growing
bourgeoisie, lusting for power, until it had fastened its class rule, in
some way or other, upon the great nations of central Europe and had
created within them the necessary tools and conditions of its growth.
Since then, imperialism has buried the old bourgeois democratic program
completely by substituting expansion-istic activity irrespective of
national relationships for the original program of the bourgeoisie in
all nations. The national phrase, to be sure, has been preserved, but
its real content, its function has been perverted into its very
opposite. Today the nation is but a cloak that covers imperialistic
desires, a battle cry for imperialistic rivalries, the last ideological
measure with which the masses can be persuaded to play the role of
cannon fodder in imperialistic wars.

 This general tendency of present day capitalist policies determines the
policies of the individual states as their supreme blindly operating
law, just as the laws of economic competition determine the conditions
under which the individual manufacturer shall produce.

 Let us assume for a moment, for the sake of argument, for the purpose
of investigating this phantom of "national wars" that controls
Social-Democratic politics at the present time, that in

 one of the belligerent states, the war at its outbreak was purely one
of national defense. Military success would immediately demand the
occupation of foreign territory. But the existence of influential
capitalist groups, interested in imperialistic annexations, will awaken
expansionistic appetites as the war goes on. The imperialistic tendency
that, at the beginning of hostilities, may have been existent only in
embryo, will shoot up and expand in the hothouse atmosphere of war until
they will in a short time, determine its character, its aims and its
results. Furthermore, the system of alliance between military states
that has ruled the political relations of these nations for decades in
the past, makes it inevitable that each of the belligerent parties in
the course of war, should try to bring its allies to its assistance,
again purely from motives of self-defense. Thus one country after
another is drawn into the war, inevitably new imperialistic circles are
touched and others are created. Thus England drew in Japan, and,
spreading the war into Asia, has brought China into the circle of
political problems and has influenced the existing rivalry between Japan
and the United States, between England and Japan, thus heaping up new
material for future conflicts. Thus Germany has dragged Turkey mto the
war, bringing the question of Constantinople, of the Balkans and of
Western Asia directly into the foreground of affairs. Even he who did
not realize at the outset that the world war, in its causes, was purely
imperialistic, cannot fail to see after a dispassionate view of its
effects that war, under the present conditions, automatically and
inevitably develops into a process of world division. This was apparent
from the very first. The wavering balance of power between the two
belligerent parties forces each, if only for military reasons, in order
to strengthen its own position, or in order to frustrate possible
attacks, to hold the neutral nations in check by intensive deals in
peoples and nations, such as the German-Austrian offers to Italy,
Rumania, Bulgaria and Greece on the one hand, and the English-Russian
bids on the other. The "National war of de-

 fense" has the surprising effect of creating, even in the neutral
nations, a general transformation of ownership and relative power,
always in direct line with expansionistic tendencies. Finally the fact
that all modern capitalist states have colonial possessions that will,
even though the war may have begun as a war of national defense, be
drawn into the conflict from purely military considerations, the fact
that each country will strive to occupy the colonial possessions of its
opponent, or at least to create disturbances therein, automatically
turns every war into an imperialistic world conflagration.

 Thus the conception of even that modest, devout fatherland-loving war
of defense that has become the ideal of our parliamentarians and editors
is pure fiction, and shows, on their part, a complete lack of
understanding of the whole war and its world relations. The character of
the war is determined, not by solemn declaration, not even by the honest
intentions of leading politicians, but by the momentary configuration of
society and its military organizations. At the first glance the term
"national war of defense" might seem applicable in the case of a country
like Switzerland. But Switzerland is no national state, and, therefore,
no object of comparison with other modern states. Its very "neutral"
existence, its luxury of a militia, are after all only the negative
fruits of a latent state of war in the surrounding great military
states. It will hold this neutrality only so long as it is willing to
oppose this condition. How quickly such a neutral state is crushed by
the military heel of imperialism in a world war the fate of Belgium
shows. This brings us to the peculiar position of the "small nation." A
classic example of such "national wars" is Servia. If ever a state,
according to formal considerations, had the right of national defense on
its side, that state is Servia. Deprived through Austrian annexations of
its national unity, threatened by Austria in its very existence as' a
nation, forced by Austria into war, it is fighting, according to all
human conceptions, for existence, for freedom and for the civili-

 zation of its people. But if the Social-Democratic group is right in
its position, then the Servian Social-Democrats who protested against
the war in the parliament at Belgrade and refused to vote war credits
are actually traitors to the most vital interests of their own nation.
In reality the Servian Socialists Lapschewitsh and Kanzlerowitsh have
not only enrolled their names in letters of gold in the annals of the
international socialist movement, but have shown a clear historical
conception of the real causes of the war. In voting against war credits
they therefore have done their country the best possible service. Servia
is formally engaged in a national war of defense. But its monarchy and
its ruling classes are filled with expansionist desires as are the
ruling classes in all modern states. They are indifferent to ethnic
lines, and thus their warfare assumes an aggressive character. Thus
Servia is today reaching out toward the Adriatic coast where it is
fighting out a real imperialistic conflict with Italy on the backs of
the Albanians, a conflict whose final outcome will be decided not by
either of the powers directly interested, but by the great powers that
will speak the last word on terms of peace. But above all this we must
not forget: behind Servian nationalism stands Russian imperialism.
Servia itself is only a pawn in the great game of world politics. A
judgment of the war in Servia from a point of view that fails to take
these great relations and the general world-political background into
account, is necessarily without foundation. The same is true of the
recent Balkan War. Regarded as an isolated occurrence, the young Balkan
States were historically justified in defending the old democratic
program of the national state. In their historical connection, however,
which makes the Balkan the burning point and the center of imperialistic
world policies, these Balkan wars, also, were objectively only a
fragment of the general conflict, a link in the chain of events that
led, with fatal necessity, to the present world war. After the Balkan
war the international Social-Democracy tendered to the Balkan
Socialists, for their

 determined refusal to offer moral or political support to the war, a
most enthusiastic ovation at the peace congress at Basel. In this act
alone the International condemned in advance the position taken by the
German and French Socialists in the present war.

 All small states, as for instance Holland, are today in a position like
that of the Balkan states, "When the ship leaks, the hole must be
stopped"; and what, forsooth, could little Holland fight for but for its
national existence and for the independence of its people? If we
consider here merely the determination of the Dutch people, even of its
ruling classes, the question is doubtlessly one purely of national
defense. But again proletarian politics cannot judge according to the
subjective purposes of a single country. Here again it must take its
position as a part of the International, according to the whole
conplexity of the world's political situation. Holland, too, whether it
wishes to be or not, is only a small wheel in the great machine of modem
world politics and diplomacy. This would become clear at once, if
Holland were actually torn into the maelstrom of the world war. Its
opponents would direct their attacks against its colonies. Automatically
Dutch warfare would turn to the defense of its present possessions. The
defense of the national independence of the Dutch people on the North
Sea would expand concretely to the defense of its rule and right of
exploitation over the Malays in the East Indian Archipelago. But not
enough: Dutch militarism, if forced to rely upon itself, would be
crushed like a nutshell in the whirlpool of the world war. Whether it
wished to or not it would become a member of one of the great national
alliances. On one side or the other it must be the bearer and the tool
of purely imperialistic tendencies.

 Thus it is always the historic milieu of modem imperialism that
determines the character of the war in the individual countries, and
this milieu makes a war of national self-defense impossible.

 Kautsky also expressed this, only a few years ago, in his pamphlet
"Patriotism and Social-Democracy," Leipzig, 1907:

 "Though the patriotism of the bourgeoisie and of the proletariat are
two entirely different, actually opposite phenomena, there are
situations in which both kinds of patriotism may join forces for united
action, even in times of war. The bourgeoisie and the proletariat of a
nation are equally interested in their national independence and
self-determination, in the removal of all kinds of oppression and
exploitation at the hands of a foreign nation. In the national conflicts
that have sprung from such attempts, the patriotism of the proletariat
has always united with that of the bourgeoisie. But the proletariat has
become a power that may become dangerous to the ruling classes at every
great national upheaval; revolution looms dark at the end of every war,
as the Paris Commune of 1871 and Russian terrorism after the
Russian-Japanese war have proven. In view of this the bourgeoisie of
those nations which are not sufficiently united have actually sacrificed
their national aims where these can be maintained only at the expense of
their government, for they hate and fear the revolution even more than
they love national independence and greatness. For this reason, the
bourgeoisie sacrifices the independence of Poland and permits ancient
constellations like Austria and Turkey to remain in existence, though
they have been doomed to destruction for more than a generation.
National struggles as the bringers of revolution have ceased in
civilized Europe. National problems that today can be solved only by war
or revolution, will be solved in the future only by the victory of the
proletariat. But then, thanks to international solidarity, they will at
once assume a form entirely different from that which prevails today in
a social state of exploitation and oppression. In capitalistic states
this problem needs no longer to trouble the proletariat in its practical
struggles. It must divert its whole strength to other problems." (Page
12-14.)

 "Meanwhile the likelihood that proletarian and bourgeois patriotism
will unite to protect the liberty of the people is becomings more and
more rare." Kautsky then goes on to say thqt

 the French bourgeoisie has united with Czarism, that Russia has ceased
to be a danger for western Europe because it has been weakened by the
Revolution. "Under these circumstances a war in defense of national
liberty in which bourgeois and proletarian may unite, is nowhere to be
expected." (Page 16.)

 "We have already seen that conflicts which, in the 19th century, might
still have led some liberty loving peoples to oppose their neighbors, by
warfare, have ceased to exist. We have seen that modem militarism
nowhere aims to defend important popular rights, but everywhere strives
to support profits. Its activities are dedicated not to assure the
independence and invulnerability of its own nationality, that is nowhere
threatened, but to the assurance and the extension of over-sea conquests
that again only serve the aggrandizement of capitalist profits. At the
present time the conflicts between states can bring no war that
proletarian interests would not, as a matter of duty, energetically
oppose." (Page 23.)

 In view of all these considerations, what shall be the practical
attitude of the Social-Democracy in the present war? Shall it declare:
since this is an imperialistic war, since we do not enjoy in our
country, any Socialist self-determination, its existence or
non-existence is of no consequence to us, and we will surrender it to
the enemy? Passive fatalism can never be the role of a revolutionary
party, like the Social-Democracy. It must neither place itself at the
disposal of the existing class state, under the command of the ruling
classes, nor can it stand silently by to wait until the storm is past.
It must adopt a policy of active class politics, a policy that will whip
the ruling classes forward in every great social crisis, and that will
drive the crisis itself far beyond its original extent. That is the role
that the Social-Democracy must play as the leader of the fighting
proletariat. Instead of covering this imperialistic war with a lying
mantle of national self-defense, the Social-Democracy should have
demanded the

 right of national self-determination seriously, should have used it as
a lever against the imperialistic war.

 The most elementary demand of national defense is that the nation take
its defense into its own hands. The first step in this direction is the
militia; not only the immediate armament of the entire adult male
populace, but above all, popular decision in all questions of peace and
war. It must demand, furthermore, the immediate removal of every form of
political oppression, since the greatest political freedom is the best
basis for national defense. To proclaim these fundamental measures of
national defense, to demand their realization, that was the first duty
of the Social-Democracy.

 For forty years we have tried to prove to the ruling classes as well as
to the masses of the people that only the militia is really able to
defend the fatherland and to make it invincible. And yet, when the first
test came, we turned over the defense of our country, as a matter of
course, into the hands of a standing army, to be the cannon fodder under
the club of the ruling classes. Our parliamentarians apparently did not
even notice that the fervent wishes with which they sped these defenders
of the fatherland to the front were, to all intents and purposes, an
open admission that the imperial Prussian standing army is the real
defender of the fatherland. They evidently did not realize that by this
admission they sacrificed the fulcrum of our political program, that
they gave up the militia and dissolved the practical significance of
forty years' of agitation against the standing army into thin air. By
the act of the Social-Democratic group our military program became a
Utopian doctrine, a doctrinaire obsession, that none could possibly take
seriously.

 The masters of the international proletariat saw the idea of fatherland
defense in a different light. When the proletariat of Paris, surrounded
by Prussians in 1871, took the reins of the government into its own
hands, Marx wrote enthusiastically:

 "Paris, the center and seat of the old government powers, and
simultaneously the social center of gravity of the French working class,
Paris has risen in arms against the attempt of Monsieur Thiers and his
Junkers to reinstate and perpetuate the government of the old powers of
imperial rule. Paris was in a position to resist only, because, through
the state of siege, it was rid of its army, because in its place there
had been put a national guard composed chiefly of working men. It was
necessary that this innovation be made a permanent institution. The
first act of the Commune was, therefore, the suppression of the standing
army and the substitution of an armed people.... If now, the Commune was
the true representative of all healthy elements of French society and,
therefore, a true national government, it was likewise, as a proletarian
government, as the daring fighter for the liberation of labor,
international in the truest sense of that word. Under the eyes of the
Prussian army, which has annexed two French Provinces to Germany, the
Commune has annexed the workers of a whole world to France." (Address of
the General Council of the International.)

 But what did our masters say concerning the role to be played by the
Social-Democracy in the present war? In 1892 Friedrich Engels expressed
the following opinion concerning the fundamental lines along which the
attitude of proletarian parties in a great war should follow:

 "A war in the course of which Russians and Frenchmen should invade
Germany would mean for the latter a life and death struggle. Under such
circumstances it could assure its national existence only by using the
most revolutionary methods. The present government, should it not be
forced to do so, will certainly not bring on the revolution, but we have
a strong party that may force its hand, or that, should it be necessary,
can replace it, the Social-Democratic party.

 "We have not forgotten the glorious example of France in 1793.

 The one hundredth anniversary of 1793 is approaching. Should Russia's
desire for conquest, or the chauvinistic impatience of the French
Bourgeoisie, check the victorious but peaceable march of the German
Socialists, the latter are prepared—be assured of that—to prove to the
world that the German proletarians of today are not unworthy of the
French Sansculottes, that 1893 will be worthy of 1793. And should the
soldiers of Monsieur Constans set foot upon German territory we will
meet them with the words of the Marseillaise:

 "Shall hateful tyrants, mischief breeding, With hireling host, a
ruffian band. Affright and desolate the land?"

 "In short, peace assures the victory of the Social-Democratic party in
about ten years. The war will bring either victory in two or three years
or its absolute ruin for at least fifteen or twenty years."

 When Engels wrote these words, he had in mind a situation entirely
different from the one existing today. In his mind's eye, ancient
Czarism still loomed threateningly in the background. We have already
seen the great Russian Revolution. He thought, furthermore, of a real
national war of defense, of a Germany attacked on two sides, on the East
and on the West by two enemy forces. Finally, he overestimated the
ripeness of conditions in Germany and the likelihood of a social
revolution, as all true fighters are wont to overrate the real tempo of
development. But for all that, his sentences prove with remarkable
clearness, that Engels meant by national, defense in the sense of the
Social-Democracy, not the support of a Prussian Junker military
government and its Generalstab, but a revolutionary action after the
example of the French Jacobites.

 Yes, Socialists should defend their country in great historical crises,
and here lies the great fault of the German Social-Demo-

 cratic Reichstag group. When it announced on the 4th of August, '"in
this hour of danger, we will not desert our fatherland," it denied its
own words in the same breath. For truly it has deserted its fatherland
in its hour of greatest danger. The highest duty of the Social-Democracy
toward its fatherland demanded that it expose the real background of
this imperialistic war, that it rend the net of imperialistic and
diplomatic lies that covers the eyes of the people. It was their duty to
speak loudly and clearly, to proclaim to the people of Germany that in
this war victory and defeat would be equally fatal, to oppose the
gagging of the fatherland by a state of siege, to demand that the people
alone decide on war and peace, to demand a permanent se,ssion of
Parliament for the period of the war, to assume a watchful control over
the government by parliament, and over parliament by the people, to
demand the immediate removal of all political inequalities, since only a
free people can adequately govern its country, and finally, to oppose to
the imperialist war, based as it was upon the most reactionary forces in
Europe, the program of Marx, of Engels, and Lassalle.

 That was the flag that should have waved over the country. That would
have been truly national, truly free, in harmony with the best
traditions of Germany and the International class policy of the
proletariat.

 The great historical hour of the world war obviously demanded a
unanimous political accomplishment, a broadminded, comprehensive
attitude that only the Social-Democracy is destined to give. Instead,
there followed, on the part of the parliamentary representatives of the
working class, a miserable collapse. The Social-Democracy did not adopt
the wrong policy—it had no policy whatsoever. It has wiped itself out
completely as a class party with a world-conception of its own, has
delivered the country, without a word of protest, to the fate of
imperialistic war without, to the dictatorship of the sword within. Nay
more, it has taken the responsibility for the war upon its own
shoulders.

 The declaration of the "Reichstag group" says: "We have voted only the
means for our country's defense. We decline all responsibility for the
war." But as a matter of fact, the truth lies in exactly the opposite
direction. The means for "national defense," i. e., for imperialistic
mass butchery by the armed forces of the military monarchy, were not
voted by the Social-Democracy. For the availability of the war credits
did not in the least depend upon the Social-Democracy. They, as a
minority, stood against a compact three-quarters majority of the
capitalist Reichstag. The Social-Democracy group accomplished only one
thing by voting in favor of the war credits. It placed upon the war the
stamp of democratic fatherland defense, and supported and sustained the
fictions that were propagated by the government concerning the actual
conditions and problems of the war.

 Thus the serious dilemma between the national interests and
international solidarity of the proletariat, the tragic conflict that
made our parliamentarians fall "with heavy heart" to the side of
imperialistic warfare, was a mere figment of the imagination, a
bourgeois nationalist fiction. Between the national interests and the
class interests of the proletariat, in war and in peace, there is
actually complete harmony. Both demand the most energetic prosecution of
the class struggle, and the most determined insistence on the
Social-Democratic program.

 But what action shbuld the party have taken to give to our opposition
to the war and to our war demands weight and emphasis? Should it have
proclaimed a general strike? Should it have called upon the soldiers to
refuse military service? Thus the question is generally asked. To answer
with a simple yes or no, were just as ridiculous as to decide: "When war
breaks out we will start a revolution." Revolutions are not "made" and
great movements of the people are not produced according to technical
recipes that repose in the pockets of the party leaders. Small circles
of conspirators may organize a riot for a certain day and a certain
hour, can give their small group of supporters

 the signal to begin. Mass movements in great historical crises cannot
be initiated by such primitive measures. The best prepared mass strike
may break down miserably at the very moment when the party leaders give
the signal, may collapse completely before the first attack. The success
of great popular movements depends, aye, the very time and circumstance
of their inception is decided, by a number of economic, political and
psychological factors. The existing degree of tension between the
classes, the degree of intelligence of the masses and the degree or
ripeness of their spirit of resistance—all these factors, which are
incalculable, are premises that cannot be artificially created by any
party. That is the difference between great historical upheavals, and
the small show-demonstrations that a well disciplined party can carry
out in times of peace, orderly, well-trained performances, responding
obediently to the baton in the hands of the party leaders. The great
historical hour itself creates the forms that will carry the
revolutionary movement to a successful outcome, creates and improvises
new weapons, enriches the arsenal of the people with weapons unknown and
unheard of by the parties and their leaders.

 What the Social-Democracy as the advance guard of the class-conscious
proletariat should have been able to give was not ridiculous precepts
and technical recipes, but a political slogan, clearness concerning the
political problems and interests of the proletariat in times of war.

 For what has been said of mass strikes in the Russian Revolution is
equally applicable to every mass movement: "While the revolutionary
period itself commands the creation and the computation and payment of
the cost of a mass strike, the leaders of the Social-Democracy have an
entirely different mission to fill. Instead of concerning itself with
the technical mechanism of the mass movement, it is the duty of the
Social-Democracy to undertake the political leadership even in the midst
of a historical crisis. To give the slogan, to determine the direction
of the

 struggle, to so direct the tactics of the poHtical conflict that in its
every phase and movement the whole sum of available and already
mobilized active force of the proletariat is realized and finds
expression in the attitude of the party, that the tactics of the
Social-Democracy in determination and vigor shall never be weaker than
is justified by the actual power at its back, but shall rather hasten in
advance of its actual power, that is the important problem of the party
leadership in a great historical crisis. Then this leadership will
become, in a sense, the technical leadership. A determined, consistent,
progressive course of action on the part of the Social-Democracy will
create in the masses assurance, self-confidence and a fearless fighting
spirit. A weakly vacillating course, based upon a low estimate of the
powers of the proletariat, lames and confuses the masses. In the first
case mass action will break out "of its own accord" and "at the right
time"; in the second even a direct call to action on the part of the
leaders often remains ineflFectual." (Rosa Luxemburg, "Mass Strike,
Party and Labor Unions," Hamburg, 1907.)

 Far more important that the outward, technical form of the action is
its political content. Thus the parliamentary stage, for instance, the
only far reaching and internationally conspicuous platform, could have
become a mighty motive power for the awakening of the people, had it
been used by the Social-Democratic representatives to proclaim loudly
and distinctly, the interests, the problems and the demands of the
working class.

 "Would the masses have supported the Social-Democracy in its. attitude
against the war?" That is a question that no one can answer. But neither
is it an important one. Did our parliamentarians demand an absolute
assurance of victory from the generals of the Prussian army before
voting in favor of war credits ? What is true of military armies is
equally true of revolutionary armies. They go into the fight, wherever
necessity demands it, without previous assurance of success. At the
worst,

 the party would have been doomed, in the first few months of the war,
to political ineffectuality.

 Perhaps the bitterest persecutions would have been inflicted upon our
party for its manly stand, as they were, in 1870, the reward of
Liebknecht and Bebel. "But what does that matter," said Ignatz Auer,
simply, in his speech on the Sedanfeier in 1895. "A party that is to
conquer the world must bear its principles aloft without counting the
dangers that this may bring. To act differently is to be lost!"

 "It is never easy to swim against the current," said the older
Liebknecht, "And when the stream rushes on with the rapidity and the
power of a Niagara it does not become easier! Our older comrades still
remember- the hatred of that year of greatest national shame, under the
Socialist exception laws of 1878. At that time millions looked upon
every Social-Democrat as having played the part of a murderer and a vile
criminal in 1870; the Socialist had been in the eyes of the masses a
traitor and an enemy. Such outbreaks of the "popular soul" are
astounding, stunning, crushing in their elemental fury. One feels
powerless, as before a higher power. It is a real force majeure. There
is no tangible opponent. It 'is like an epidemic, in the people, in the
air, everywhere.

 "The outbreak of 1878 cannot, however, be compared with the outbreak in
1870. This hurricane of human passions, breaking, bending, destroying
all that stands in its way—and with it the terrible machinery of
militarism, in fullest, most horrible activity; and we stand between the
crushing iron wheels, whose touch means instant death, between iron
arms, that threaten every moment to catch us. By the side of this
elemental force of liberated spirits stood the most complete mechanism
of the art of murder the world had hitherto seen; and all in the wildest
activity, every boiler heated to the bursting point. At such a time,
what is the will and the strength of the individual? Especially,

 when one feels that one represents a tiny minority, that one possesses
no firm support in the people itself.

 "At that time our party was still in a period of development. We were
placed before the most serious test, at a time when we did not yet
possess the organization necessary to meet it. When the anti-socialist
movement came in the year of shame of our enemies, in the year of honor
for the Social-Democracy, then we had already a strong, widespread
organization. Each and every one of us was strengthened by the feeling
that he possessed a mighty support in the organized movement that stood
behind him, and no sane person could conceive of the downfall of the
party.

 "So it was no small thing at that time to swim against the current. But
what is to be done, must be done. And so we gritted our teeth in the
face of the inevitable. There was no time for fear . "*. . Certainly
Bebel and I . . . never for a moment thought of the warning. We did not
retreat. We had to hold our posts, come what might!"

 They stuck to their posts, and for forty years the Social-Democracy
lived upon the moral strength with which it had opposed a world of
enemies.

 The same thing would have happened now. At first we would perhaps have
accomplished nothing but to save the honor of the proletariat and
thousands upon thousands of proletarians who are dying in the trenches
in mental darkness, would not have died in spiritual confusion, but with
the one certainty that that which has been everything in their lives,
the international, liberating Social-Democracy, is more than the figment
of a dream.

 The voice of our party would have acted as a wet blanket upon the
chauvinistic intoxication of the masses. It would have preserved the
intelligent proletariat from delirium, would have made it more difficult
for Imperialism to poison and to stupefy the minds of the people. The
crusade against the Social-Democracy would have awakened the masses in
an incredible short time.

 And as the war went on, as the horror of endless massacre and bloodshed
in all countries grew and grew, as its imperialistic hoof became more
and more evident, as the exploitation by bloodthirsty speculators became
more and more shameless, every live, honest, progressive and humane
element in the masses would have rallied to the standard of the
Social-Democracy. The German Social-Democracy would have stood in the
midst of this mad whirlpool of collapse and decay, like a rock in a
stormy sea, would have been the lighthouse of the whole International,
guiding and leading the labor movements of every country of the earth.
The unparalleled moral prestige that lay in the hands of the German
Socialists would have reacted upon the Socialists of all nations in a
very short time. Peace sentiments would have spread like wildfire and
the popular demand for peace in all countries would have hastened the
end of the slaughter, would have decreased the number of its victims.

 The German proletariat would have remained the lighthouse-keeper of
Socialism and of human emancipation.

 Truly this was a task not unworthy of the disciples of Marx, Engels,
and Lassalle.

 CHAPTER VIIL

 In spite of military dictatorship and press censorship, in spite of the
downfall of the Social-Democracy, in spite of fratricidal war, the class
struggle arises from civil peace with elemental force: from the blood
and smoke of the battlefields the solidarity of international labor
arises. Not in weak attempts to artificially galvanize the old
International, not in pledges rendered now here, now there, to stand
together after the war is over. No, here, in the war, out of the war
arises, with a new might and intensity, the recognition that the
proletarians of all lands have one and the same interest. The world war,
itself, utterly disproves the falsehoods it has created.

 Victory or defeat? It is the slogan of all-powerful militarism in every
belligerent nation, and, like an echo, the social-democratic leaders
have adopted it. Victory or defeat has become the highest motive of the
workers of Germany, of France, of England and of others, just as for the
ruling classes of these nations. When the cannons thunder, all
proletarian interests subside before the desire for victory of their
own, i. e., for defeat of the other countries. And yet, what can victory
bring to the proletariat ?

 According to the official version of the leaders of the
Social-Democracy, that was so readily adopted without criticism, victory
of the German forces would mean, for Germany, unhampered, boimdless
industrial growth; defeat, however, industrial ruin. On the whole, this
conception coincides with that generally accepted during the war of
1870. But the period of capitalist growth that followed the war of 1870
was not caused by the war, but resulted rather from the political union
of the various German states, even though this union took the form of
the crippled figure that Bismarck established as the German empire. Here
the in-

 dustrial impetus came from this union, in spite of the war and the
manifold reactionary hindrances that followed in its wake. What the
victorious war itself accomplished was to firmly establish the military
monarchy and Prussian junkerdom in Germany; the defeat of France led to
the liquidation of its Empire and the establishment of a Republic. But
today the situation is different in all of the nations in question.
Today war does not function as a dynamic force to provide for rising
young capitalism the indispensable political conditions for its
"national" development. Modern war appears in this role only in Serbia,
and there only as an isolated fragment. Reduced to its objective
historic significance, the present world war as a whole is a competitive
struggle of a fully developed capitalism for world supremacy, for the
exploitation of the last remnant of non-capitalistic world zones. This
fact gives to the war and its political after effects an entirely new
character. The high stage of world-industrial development in
capitalistic production finds expression in the extraordinary technical
development and destructiveness of the instruments of war, as in their
practically uniform degree of perfection in all belligerent countries.
The international organization of war industries is reflected in the
military instability, that persistently brings back the scales, through
all partial decisions and variations, to their true balance, and pushes
a general decision further and further into the future. The indecision
of military results, moreover, has the effect that a constant stream of
new reserves, from the belligerent nations as well as from nations
hitherto neutral, are sent to the front. Everywhere war finds material
enough for imperialist desires and conflicts; itself creates new
material to feed the conflagration that spreads out like a prairie fire.
But the greater the masses, and the greater the number of nations that
are dragged into this world-war, the longer will it rage. All of these
things together prove, even before any military decision of victory or
defeat can be established, that the result of the war will be: the
economic ruin of all

 THE CRISIS ll'?

 participating nations, and, in a steadily growing measure, of the
formally neutral nations, a phenomenon entirely distinct from the
earlier wars of modern times. Every month of war affirms and augments
this effect, and thus takes away, in advance, the expected fruits of
military victory for a decade to come. This, in the last analysis,
neither victory nor defeat can alter; on the contrary it makes a purely
military decision altogether doubtful, and increases the likelihood that
the war will finally end through a general and extreme exhaustion. But
even a victorious Germany, under such circumstances, even if its
imperialistic war agitators should succeed in carrying on the mass
murder to the absolute destruction of their opponents, even if their
most daring dreams should be fulfilled—would win but a Pyrrhic victory.
A number of annexed territories, impoverished and depopulated, and a
grinning ruin under its own roof, would be its trophies. Nothing can
hide this, once the painted stage properties of financial war-bond
transactions, and the Potemkin villages of an "unalterable prosperity"
kept up by war orders, are pushed aside. The most superficial observer
cannot but see that even the most victorious nation cannot count on war
indemnities that will stand in any relation to the wounds that the war
has inflicted. Perhaps they may see in the still greater economic ruin
of the defeated opponents, England and France, the very countries with
which Germany was most closely united by industrial relations, upon
whose recuperation its own prosperity so much depends, a substitute and
an augmentation for their victory. Such are the circumstances under
which the German people, even after a victorious war, would be required
to pay, in cold cash, the war bonds that were "voted" on credit by the
patriotic parliament; i. e., to take upon their shoulders an
immeasurable burden of taxation, and a strengthened military
dictatorship as the only permanent tangible fruit of victory.

 Should we now seek to imagine the worst possible effects of

 a defeat, we shall find that they resemble, line for line, with the
exception of imperialistic annexations, the same picture that presented
itself as the irrefutable consequence of victory: the effects of war
today are so far reaching, so deeply rooted, that its military outcome
can alter but little in its final consequences.

 But let us assume, for the moment, that the victorious nation should
find itself in the position to avoid the great catastrophe for its own
people, should be able to tkrow the whole burden of the war upon the
shoulders of its defeated opponent, should be able to choke off the
industrial development of the latter by all sorts of hindrances. Can the
German labor movement hope for successful development, so long as the
activity of the French, English, Belgian and Italian laborers is
hampered by industrial retrogression? Before 1870 the labor movements of
the various nations grew independently of each other. The action of the
nations grew, independently of each other. The action of the labor
movement of a single city often controlled the destinies of the whole
labor movement. On the streets of Paris the battles of the working class
were fought out and decided. The modem labor movement, its laborious
daily struggle in the industries of the world, its mass organization,
are based upon the co-operation of the workers in all capitalistically
producing countries. If the truism that the cause of labor can thrive
only upon a virile, pulsating industrial life applies, then it is true
not only for Germany, but for France, England, Belgium, Russia, and
Italy as well. And if the labor movement in all of the capitalist states
of Europe becomes stagnant, if industrial conditions there result in low
wages, weakened labor unions, and a diminished power of resistance on
the part of labor, labor unionism in Germany cannot possibly flourish.
From this point of view the loss sustained by the working class in its
industrial struggle is in the last analysis identical, whether German
capital be strengthened at the expense of the French or English capital
at the expense of the German.

 But let us investigate the political effects of the war. Here
differentiation should be less difficult than upon the economic side,
for the sympathies and the partisanship of the proletariat have always
tended toward the side that defended progress against reaction. Which
side, in the present war, represents progress, which side reaction? It
is clear that this question cannot be decided according to the outward
insignias that mark the political character of the belligerent nations
as "democracy" and absolutism. They must be judged solely according to
the tendencies of their respective world pdlicies.

 Before we can determine what a German victory can win for the German
proletariat we must consider its effect upon the general status of
political conditions all over Europe. A decisive victory for Germany
would mean, in the first place, the annexation of Belgium, as well as of
a possible number of territories in the East and West and a part of the
French colonies; the sustaining of the Hapsburg Monarchy and its
aggrandizement by a number of new territories; finally the €stablishment
of a fictitious "integrity" of Turkey, under a German protectorate—i.
e., the conversion of Asia Minor and Mesopotamia, in one form or
another, into German provinces. In the end this would result in the
actual military and economic hegemony of Germany in Europe. Not because
they are in accord with the desires of imperialist agitators are these
consequences of an absolute German military victory to be expected, but
because they are the inevitable outgrowth of the world-political
position that Germany has adopted, of conflicting interests with
England, France, and Russia, in which Germany has been involved, and
which have grown, during the course of the war, far beyond their
original dimensions. It is sufficient to recall these facts to realize
that they could under no circumstances .establish a permanent
world-political equilibrium. Though this war may mean ruin for all of
its participants, and worse for its defeated, the preparations

 for a new world war, under England's leadership, would begin on the day
after peace is declared, to shake off the yoke of Prussian-German
militarism that would rest upon Europe and Asia. A German victory would
be the prelude to an early second world-war, and therefore, for this
reason, but the signal for new feverish armaments, for the unleashing of
the blackest reaction in every country, but particularly in Germany. On
the other hand a victory of England or France would mean, in all
likelihood, for Germany, the loss of a part of her colonies, as well as
of Alsace-Lorraine, and certainly the bankruptcy of the world-political
position of German militarism. But this would mean the disintegration of
Austria-Hungary and the total liquidation of Turkey. Reactionary as both
of these states are, and much as their disintegration would be in line
with the demands of progressive development, in the present
world-political milieu, the disintegration of the Hapsburg Monarchy and
the liquidation of Turkey would mean the bartering of their peoples to
the highest bidder—Russia, England, France, or Italy. This enormous
re-division of the world and shifting of the balance of power in the
Balkan states and along the Mediterranean would be followed inevitably
by another in Asia: the liquidation of Persia and a redivision of China.
This would bring the English-Russian as well as the English-Japanese
conflict into the foreground of international politics, and may mean, in
direct connection with the liquidation of the present war, a new world
war, perhaps for Constantinople; would certainly bring it about,
inescapably, in the immediate future. So a victory on this side, too,
would lead to new, feverish armaments in all nations—defeated Germany,
of course, at the head—and would introduce an era of undivided rule for
militarism and reaction all over Europe, with a new war as its final
goal.

 So the proletariat, should it attempt to cast its influence into the
balance on one side or the other, for progress or democracy, viewing the
world policies in their widest application, would place

 itself between Scylla and Charybdis. Under the circumstances the
question of victory or defeat becomes, for theEuropean working class, in
its political, exactly as in its economic aspects, a choice between two
beatings. It is, therefore, nothing short of a dangerous madness for the
French Socialists to believe that they can deal a death blow to
militarism and imperialism, and cleai the road for peaceful democracy,
by overthrowing Germany. Imperialism, and its servant militarism, will
reappear after every victory and after every defeat in this war. There
can be but one exception: if the international proletariat, through its
intervention, should overthrow all previous calculations.

 The important lesson to be derived by the proletariat from this war is
the one unchanging fact, that it can and must not become the uncritical
echo of the "victory and defeat" slogan, neither in Germany nor in
France, neither in England nor in Austria. For it is a slogan that has
reality only from the point of view of imperialism, and is identical, in
the eyes of every large power, with the question: gain or loss of
world-political power, of annexations, of colonies, of military
supremacy.

 For the European proletariat as a class, victory or defeat of either of
the two war groups would be equally disastrous. For war as such,
whatever its military outcome may be, is the greatest conceivable defeat
of the cause of the European proletariat. The overthrow of war, and the
speedy forcing of peace, by the international revolutionary action of
the proletariat, alone can bring to it the only possible victory. And
this victory, alone, can truly rescue Belgium, can bring democracy to
Europe.

 For the class-conscious proletariat to identify its cause with either
military camp is an untenable position. Does that mean that the
proletarian policies of the present day demand a return to thfe "status
quo," that we have no plan of action beyond the fond hope that
everything may remain as it was before the war?

 The existing conditions have never been our ideal, they have never been
the expression of the self-determination of the people. And more, the
former conditions cannot be reinstated, even if the old national
boundaries should remain unchanged. For even before its formal ending
this war has brought about enormous changes, in mutual recognition of
one another's strength, in alliances, and in conflict. It has sharply
revised the relations of countries to one another, of classes within
society, has destroyed so many old illusions and portents, has created
so many new forces and new problems, that a return to the old Europe
that existed before August 4, 1914, is as impossible as the return to
pre-revolutionary conditions, even after an unsuccessful revolution. The
proletariat knows no going back, can only strive forward and onward, for
a goal that lies beyond even the most newly created conditions. In this
sense, alone, is it possible for the proletariat to oppose, with its
policy, both camps in the imperialistic world war.

 But this policy cannot concern- itself with recipes for capitalist
diplomacy worked out individually by the Social-Democratic parties, or
even together in international conferences, to determine how capitalism
shall declare peace in order to assure future eaceful and democratic
development. All demands for complete or gradual disarmament, for the
abolition of secret diplomacy, for the dissolution of the great powers
into smaller national entities, and all other similar propositions, are
absolutely Utopian so long as capitalist class rule remains in power.
For capitalism, in its present imperialistic course, to dispense with
present-day militarism, with secret diplomacy, with the centralization
of many national states, is so impossible that these postulates might,
much more consistently, be united into the simple demand "abolition of
capitalist class society." The proletarian movement cannot reconquer the
place it deserves by means of Utopian advice and projects for weakening,
taming, or quelling imperialism within capitalism by means of partial
reforms. The real problem that

 the world war has placed before the Socialist parties, upon whose
solution the future of the working class movement depends, is the
readiness of the proletarian masses to act in the fight against
imperialism. The international proletariat suffers, not from a dearth of
postulates, programs, and slogans, but from a lack of deeds, of
effective resistance, of the power to attack imperialism at the decisive
moment, just in times of war. It has been unable to put its old slogan,
war against war, into actual practice. Here is the Gordian knot of the
proletarian movement and of its future.

 Imperialism, with all its brutal policy of force, with the incessant
chain of social catastrophe that it itself provokes, is, to be sure, a
historic necessity for the ruling classes of the present world. Yet
nothing could be more detrimental than that the proletariat should
derive, from the present war, the slightest hopr: or illusion of the
possibility of an idyllic and peaceful development of capitalism. There
is but one conclusion that the proletariat can draw from the historic
necessity of imperialism. To capitulate before imperialism will mean to
live forever in its shadow, off the crumbs that fall from the table of
its victories

 Historic development moves in contradictions, and for every necessity
puts its opposite into the world as well. The capitalist state of
society is doubtless a historic necessity, but so al.^o is the revolt of
the working class against it. Capital is a historic necessity, but in
the same measure is its grave digger, the Socialist proletariat. The
world rule of imperialism is a historic necessity, but likewise its
overthrow by the proletarian international. Side by side the two
historic necessities exist, in constant conflict with each other. And
ours is the necessity of Socialism. Our necessity receives its
justification with the moment when the capitalist class ceases to be the
bearer of historic progress, when it becomes a hindrance, a danger, to
the future development of society. That

 capitalism has reached this stage the present world war has revealed.

 CapitaHst desire for imperiaHstic expansion, as the expression of its
highest maturity in the last period of its life, has the economic
tendency to change the whole world into capitalistically producing
nations, to sweep away all superannuated, precapi-talistic methods of
production and of society, to subjugate all the riches of the earth and
all means of production to capital, to turn the laboring masses of the
peoples of all zones into ^vage slaves. In Africa and in Asia, from the
most northern regions to the southernmost point of South America and in
the South Seas, the remnants of old communistic social groups, of feuial
society, of patriarchal systems, and of ancient handicraft production
are destroyed and stamped out by capitalism. Whole peoples are
destroyed, ancient civilizations are leveled to the ground, and in their
place profiteering in its most modern forms is being established. ,This
brutal triumphal procession of capitalism through the world, accompanied
by all the means of force, of robbery, and of infamy, has one bright
phase: It has created the premises for its own final overthrow, it has
established the capitalist world rule upon which, alone, the Socialist
world revolution can follow. This is the only cultural and progressive
aspect of the great so-called works of culture that were brought to the
primitive countries. To capitalist economists and politicians railroads,
matches, sewerage systems and warehouses are progress and culture. Of
themselves such works, grafted upon primitive conditions, are neither
culture nor progress, for they are too dearly paid for with the sudden
economic and cultural ruin of the peoples who must drink down the bitter
cup of misery and horror of two social orders, of traditional
agricultural landlordism, of supermodern, superrefined capitalist
exploitation, at one and the same time. Only as the material conditions
for the destruction of capitalism and the abolition of class society

 can the effects of the capitalist triumphal march through the world
bear the stamp of progress in an historical sense. In this sense
imperialism, too, is working in our interest.

 The present world war is a turning point in the course of imperialism.
For the first time the destructive beasts that have been loosed by
capitalist Europe over all other parts of the world have sprung with one
awful leap, into the midst of the European nations. A cry of horror went
up through the world when Belgium, that priceless little jewel of
European culture, when the venerable monuments of art in northern
France, fell into fragments before the onslaughts of a blind and
destructive force. The "civilized world" that had stood calmly by when
this same imperialism doomed tens of thousands of heroes to destruction,
when the desert of Kalahari shuddered with the insane cry of the thirsty
and the rattling breath of the dying, when in Putu-mayo, within ten
years, forty thousand human beings were tortured to death by a band of
European industrial robber-barons, and the remnants of a whole people
were beaten into cripples, when in China an ancient civilization was
delivered into the hands of destruction and anarchy, with fire and
slaughter, by the European soldiery, when Persia gasped in the noose of
the foreign rule of force that closed inexorably about her throat, when
in Tripoli the Arabs were mowed down, with fire and sword, under the
yoke of capital, while their civilization and their homes were razed to
the ground—this civilized world has just begun to know that the fangs of
the imperialist beast are deadly, that its breath is frightfulness, that
its tearing claws have sunk deep into the breasts of its own mother,
European culture. And this belated recognition is coming into the world
of Europe in the distorted form of bourgeois hypocrisy, that leads each
nation to recognize infamy only when it appears in the uniform of the
other. They speak of German barbarism, as if every people that goes out
for organized murder did not change into a horde of barbarians! They
speak of Cossack horrors, as if war itself

 were not the the greatest of all horrors, as if the praise of human
slaughter in a Socialist periodical were not mental Cossackdom in its
very essence.

 But the horrors of imperialist bestiality in Europe have had another
effect, that has brought to the "civilized world" no horror-stricken
eyes, no agoniz.ed heart. It is the mass destruction of the European
proletariat. Never has a war killed off whole nations; never, within the
past century, has it swept over all of the great and established lands
of civilized Europe. Millions of human lives were destroyed in the
Vosges, in the Ardennes, in Belgium, in Poland, in the Carpathians and
on the Save; millions have been hopelessly crippled. But nine-tenths of
these millions come from the ranks of the working class of the cities
and the farms. It is our strength, our hope that was mowed down there,
day after day, before the scythe of death. They were the best, the most
intelligent, the most thoroughly schooled forces of international
socialism, the bearers of the holiest traditions, of the highest
heroism, the modern labor movement, the vanguard of the whole world
proletariat, the workers of England, France, Belgium, Germany and Russia
who are being gagged and butchered in masses. Only from Europe, only
from the oldest capitalist nations, when the hour is ripe, can the
signal come for the social revolution that will free the nations. Only
the English, the French, the Belgian, the German, the Russian, the
Italian workers, together, can lead the army of the exploited and
oppressed. And when the time comes they alone can call capitalism to
account for centuries of crime committed against, primitive peoples;
they alone can avenge its work of destruction over a whole world. But
for the advance and victory of Socialism we need a strong, educated,
ready proletariat, masses whose strength lies in knowledge as well as in
numbers. And these very masses are being decimated all over the world.
The flower of our youthful strength, hundreds of thousands whose
socialist education in England, in France, in Belgium, in Germany and in
Russia was

 the product of decades of education and propaganda, other hundreds of
thousands who were ready to receive the lessons of Socialism, have
fallen, and are rotting upon the battlefields. The fruit of the
sacrifices and toil of generations is destroyed in a few short weeks,
the choicest troops of the international proletariat are torn out by the
life roots.

 The blood-letting of the June battle laid low the French labor movement
for a decade and a half. The. blood-letting of the Commune massacre
again threw it back for more than a decade. What is happening now is a
massacre such as the world has never seen before, that is reducing the
laboring population in all of the leading nations to the aged, the women
and the maimed; a blood-letting that threatens to bleed white the
European labor movement.

 Another such war, and the hope of Socialism will be buried under the
ruins of imperialistic barbarism. That is more than the ruthless
destruction of Liege and of the Rheims Cathedral. That is a blow, not
against capitalist civilization of the past, but against Socialist
civilization of the future, a deadly blow against the force that carries
the future of mankind in its womb, that alone can rescue the precious
treasures of the past over into a better state of society. Here
capitalism reveals its death's head, here it betrays that it has
sacrificed its historic right of existence, that its rule is no longer
compatible with the progress of humanity.

 But here is proof also that the war is not only a grandiose murder, but
the suicide of the European working class. The soldiers of socialism,
the workers of England, of France, of Germany, of Italy, of Belgium are
murdering each other at the bidding of capitalism, are thrusting cold,
murderous irons into each others' breasts, are tottering over their
graves, grappling in each others' death-bringing arms.

 "Deutschland, Deutschland iiber alles/' "long live democracy," "long
live the czar and slavery," "ten thousand tent cloths, guaranteed
according to specifications," "hundred thousand pounds of bacon,"
"coffee substitute, immediate delivery" . . . dividends are
rising—proletarians falling; and with each one there sinks a fighter of
the future, a soldier of the revolution, a savior of humanity from the
yoke of capitalism, into the grave.

 This madness will not stop, and this bloody nightmare of hell will not
cease until the workers of Germany, of France, of Russia and of England
will wake up out of their drunken sleep; will clasp each other's hands
in brotherhood and will drown the bestial, chorus of war agitators and
the hoarse cry of capitalist hyenas with the mighty cry of labor,
"Proletarians of all countries, unite!"

 UC SOUTHERN REGIONAL LIBRARY FAOLlTv

 

[picture0]

 

 A 000 617 592

 \ / / '^ '^'S ^ THE LIBRARY /(^^Ij 0 UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA

 Santa Barbara

 THIS BOOK IS DUE ON THE LAST DATE STAMPED BELOW.

 50 3 l]p-9 9 16. I

 Series 9482

 

[leaf 131]

 

 

[leaf 0]

 
